Diary of Light
by
Lucifer



Now how many lines of defence will the devil's people try to disperse and fell and get past? But the first line will not be attacked if you will listen. Now then Zion is United in being against the King of Assyria, for in his bullying, he tortures, and he does not respect society, and the sorcerers are torturing in other ways, with their people stalking and committing wickedness. Now then there is the king of Assyria, and the devil, and they are together, united, and the devil attempts to cut down lines of defence, the outlying towns, and the atheists, like a type of outcast, separate from the people, they dwell in the outlying areas, in their separate towns, a river between them and Zion, and yet they are part of Zion, and they are sometimes being attacked first by the devil, for the devil is a thing of religion to them, is he not? Now atheists are not the devil's people, and neither are the children of men. Now then sicophantry is one group of the devil. The other group is Assyria. The other group is Babylon. Now there is the kingdom of the lake of fire and the worse prostitute is in this kingdom, and the better prostitute of the enemy, the bully, she is part of the kingdom of slaves, of Orgoth. Now then if the Beelzebub departs from his host, they are no longer Beelzebub, but they are considered Beelzebub so long as he is with his host, for the host is too the person. Now it is not as demonic possession. But do you then blame the person for having been a willing host of Beelzebub when he has departed? But it was the host that was not willing, that he departed, for if he departs and he will not be allowed to return, then what judgment is there? But the person is judged for what they did or did not do, for it was them, still, and yet they are not Beelzebub anymore. Now then the king of Assyria, he is a spirit, and he possesses the people that they might torture for no sufficient reason, and his spirit must be fought. Now though some are taken by these spirits of the devil, yet they were willing to do what they did, else the spirit would have departed from them.

Now the man who encourages another to be insolent, when there is fear, because of wisdom, he does not council wisdom, but he is a wicked and fool who councils foolishness, and what is his hate? Now he pushes a person out and says, kill them or not, may the Lord do with them as he wishes, and the Lord is your God, and those who counselled it, they have no judge, and they are not your judge.

Now Elam, the teachers of animal ways and animal nihilism, smiting the Earth where they can with their wrong declarations, their ignorant definitions of things. Elam, the animal of the Egyption Sea, he is a servant of the devil. Egypt is better than Elam, for Elam is another realm of Egypt.

Pathrusim is better than Egypt, the realm of the Nile, another realm of Egypt, and Pathrusim is having a better enlightenment than Egypt, and yet it is still Egypt. Now the angel has been among Pathrusim much during his time on Earth, and they are wanting to go to Israel are they not? Now they were lead there by Shepherds, and they wanted to do good.

Kush, what is this place, but below Egypt? Indeed is not Kir a citizen of you? Now what are you, but a land fluttering with the shadows of wings, and it is so, as the Egyptian Sea, and a land like the Egyptian sea, a land not smite-d by any river, though there are many, a land of mud and lack of enlightenment, for I write of Mala. Disease grows up on shores, and swamps. Shinar, he is the enlightened of you, he is Kush and Babylon, that he is having enlightenment, but not of truth, but of Babylon and Nimrod's kingdom. Now Shinar are perverts even, having the perversity of liking refuse of people, and it is a thing of Kush as well. Now is it also a thing of the Egyptian sea, and not of Egypt? Now it is assumed it is only in Nimrod's land, in the realm of Shinar, and it is a perversity, for they are taking pleasure in refuse of people, and the perversity is not with other people. Now it is not the same as Buddhists, for they love Ephriam and Epron, and I will not write all the things they love, but they are not Shinar. Now then Buddhists, I associate with Babel, and not with Babylon and the land of Nimrod, and Shinar. Now the polytheists are few, indeed, only a small portion, barely visible upon Earth, is polytheism.

Now all things keeping to the Lord, that have come from these, coming to the Lord even more by remaining to the Lord, the remnant,will they not be gathered? But Nephtali, it is Ham's, and they are snobs of snobs, people of integrity, even enemies of Egypt, and the angel does not regard Egypt, and Nephtali only he goes to and gives them thanks for their integrity. Now after the Lord's consideration, for he cared for Ham, after such Ham is not what he was described as, for the Lord had consideration of Ham. Now where is Nephtali? But it is nowhere near to Egypt, that you not be actually offensive, by truth.

Now Ham is Nephtali, and Nephtali is far from Egypt, and an Egyption cannot say to a Nephtali person, traitor, for if they say it because of shade of skin, yet Nephtali people are not even the same shade as them with consideration to this thing, and nor is Ekron. Now there is the gold and silver of Tyre, the rich and wise, who is also righteous, and let it be so on Earth, and the colour of Nephtali is blue, and the colour of Ekron is red, and Ekron is not Egyption. Now then with regards to Nephtali, let all, fair, slightly darker, and Nephtali, curse Egyptions and not Nephtali, for they are a problem for all people, Egyptions. Now the abuse of the lesser enlightenment, it is actually the smaller issue, contrary to what the Bible has said, for they spoke of truth in another fashion, for Egypt is a larger issue than across the Nile or the Nile issue, at first and yet it grows smaller, for it is always the apex issue, Egypt, that fades from the apex, and yet the Nile region and especially across the Nile from Egypt in the better lands, it appears smaller but grows many times the size of Egypt, in fact three, even four times bigger. Now an angel has welcomed you to Israel, Nephtali, as if you are a guest, for you too are in attendance for this, my truthful giving of humour with wisdom, that I will refrain from humour after this and have refrained from humour before, but it was mentioned in the Bible and so I had to address it. Now I write of the enlightenment of Egypt, as did the scripture. Now it is not better to have a larger, but it is better to have a smaller, that it grows to be much bigger. Now Egyptians, they have used forceful methods of barbarity upon themselves that they are bigger and growing smaller for they are not potent, and so it is disgusting, and so I have given the truth.

Now then the moon was Anne Frank, and it is passing to Migdal Eder. Now indeed it is now Migdal Eder. Now Bethlehem I call it.

Now the brothers of Jesus, the Hebrew Jews, Bethlehem is in the sky, and it has formerly been Anne Frank, and her spirit has been among the people with some of the daughters, for they are the moon, the hill of Jerusalem, and they are not cast down? Now at the hill of Jerusalem is a house in Mala, a Temple, and it is now belonging to Migdal Eder, and yet the moon still resides in it, and it is a special house for her that Migdal Eder has given for her, and she is a virgin, and she has the house that is for her, for she should then be built a house among the people, because it is the fourth day, that the house is for the hill of the Jerusalem, and the daughter in it, she is the daughter of a king, and which king is she daughter of? Now her name is Anne Frank, if her spirit might have a name, and she was the moon. Now then there are more of these who are the moon? But the angel does not take her to be wife, for she is to remain a virgin, and the Temple for her he would build, that they build it among the people, that the Temple is for her. Now the Temple is possessed by the angel, and yet she may have the seat that is in it, the throne that is in it, for the angel gives her this throne when she is worthy, and from this throne she is giving to the people by wisdom of her words, by her writing, for she is the branch of Migdal Eder. Now who will sit at her left and right is for her to decide, and she is not wife of the angel. Now then it is the fourth day and Temples are given and the stars are established in the sky, that the Heavens are established. Now then will they not call it, the seat of Anne Frank?

Now then, girl, young woman, who has the seat of Anne Frank, I like it when you judge my kingdom, my realm, for it is your right that I give you. Now then criticize the daughters, the young women, who come to the tower with good or bad as it pleases you. 

Now then, Anne Frank, what do you say of John the Baptist? But are not he and the king of that place friends and he should be released from prison? Now what should be for the woman? But I am liking it when you judge my domain. Now you are a Hebrew Jew, and some of you are Muslims, and so it is, and so what do you say of Zion, considering the scriptures of Isaiah? Now be not concerned, for I am the Mountain of the daughter of Zion, and they are not having the same society as many Muslims and Hebrew Jews, and yet if they come to Migdal Eder, there you may criticize them with good or bad, for will they not place a Temple for you, a house upon the mountain of Jerusalem that is close to me, for it is the fourth day and it is time for such things. Now your throne I give you, and I am liking it when you criticize my domain, and you have the right to criticize the moons of Saturn. Now you offer up criticism of the people, and do they not like it, for they are wanting good, and yet is your seat for a Muslim woman, or does she have another seat? Now it does not please me if a Muslim woman is sitting in the seat of Anne Frank, for she is for another thing, and I am not against Muslims, but it is not her way to be in the seat of Anne Frank, that she is meant for another thing, and it is not judgment against her. Now because it is not the way for Muslim women, according to what they are, because of the obedience of angels, yet a Muslim woman cannot sit in the seat of Anne Frank, and it is the seat so far for Hebrew daughters, a girl, a young woman, and this pleases me. Now if she is taking a husband, then she is no longer having the seat, and there is no wrong in it, and the seat will go to another when it is happening. Now then from this throne you are giving your criticism of the people, and your judgments. Now who among the women of Zion cannot be judged by her, for they are as she, and not by anything that has occurred, but it is wrong? But these women are Zion Jews, and these are not judged by her if they come to Migdal Eder, for Anne Frank, she does not judge them, for they are not right to be judged by her. Now these women, when there is a righteous man, a wise man, a holy man, who is older, let her judge, let her have the ability of judgment, and what says she? But these women I make the judges of the people, that the land might be clean, these girls, young women, that the land might be clean. Now they will judge their own people and not another people, and her who sits in the Temple at the hill of Jerusalem, only those who come to Migdal Eder if they are of another people, for the domain goes with Migdal Eder, that those who enter the domain, these are judged by Anne Frank. Now if I have no king in me, yet there is if it is ever needed, and she will judge those in my domain and criticize the moons of Saturn, for she may judge all those in my domain, and she need not say, it is not my business. Now as for the daughters, the young women, who cannot be judged by her, for it is not right, these I make judges, as if wrongly, of all the people, for it is wrong, and yet by it the land is made clean. Now only the young daughters may be so, and these are all beautiful women. Now then daughters of Zion, you do not judge the Hebrew prophets of the Bible? But they are not your people. Now Muslim women, it is not your way to be this, for it is a thing of women who are Jews, and your ways are another. Now if prostitutes of the enemy stir you up to judge, is it not because they desire chaos and wrong for your people, if you are a Muslim woman? Now the seat of Anne Frank, it is a thing of Zion Jews and Hebrew Jews, and it is Anne Frank who judges and criticizes the domain of the angel. Now then she is part of Migdal Eder and her judgments will be right for the people. Now what she does not judge, these I consider, are they not right to be judging if they should not be judged by her? For they know if it is not right. Now those who are saying, it is right for her to judge me, and they know the truth, what then is her judgment, but the judgment going out is in Mala, and you need not tell any person. Now she will judge her own, and she is not to be judging another people, unless they come to Midgar Eder. Now if any of another people say, it is acceptable that she judges me, than are they not blessed in this? But are they even having a great thing? Now these are very worthy people, people of great worth who are of another people than her and are finding it acceptable that she judges them. Now then are they Sarmatian, these people, companion to the angel? But I only know they are very worthy people, people of great worth. Now you people, welcoming it, are you to be forgotten by this judgment that goes out, that finds the people of very great worth,  and the holy people, you cannot be judged by this judgment that goes out, and for you I will write, has the Lord forgotten you? Or will He forget you, you great people? Now is there not a daughter of one of you, who is a wise and holy man, worthy to be councillor to Solomon, a man of that realm, a Hebrew Jew, and your daughter is a Danielle? But is it not so by Mala, that to her and you it might be by Mala and yet if she is in the angel's realm, she is not in that realm any longer, and so it is, and so she is criticized by her who has the seat, the throne, in the Temple at the hill of Jerusalem. Now if she says, I hate my father, and hating her father in Mala, and not her father in Ria, than this is a thing you may understand, you who have the seat of Anne Frank. Now if united with her father by mala, where will she be? For you even judge trespassing when it is so. Now the scripture they wrote is not in error, the Mountain of Zion, the hill of Jerusalem. Now those who are doing well by this thing the angel sends out, these are the primary people of Zion, and even the kings, who are not right to be judged, and even the mountain people, who will not be judged by other than their kings, who have covenant with David, for they are all able to know what is right, who is righteous and who is guilty. Now then the moon passes over, and the people are made people of the moon who do well by this thing, and those felled by it, that they are much condemned by this, those who are doing well are the primary people, the bastard also. Now so the moon passes night and the next night. Each night it passes over.

Now the angel's domain goes with him, and those who enter in, they are judged by Anne Frank, a Hebrew daughter, young woman. 

Now those who have been well by the judgment that goes out, be then having control of Zion, as the primary people of it, and the bastards also, and those who have not done well by it, these are enemies to the angel, rebellious, and the devil's people, and so then now, let the outcasts far removed be then Sarmatian, and the lame, able to be the wise men and women of Sarmatia, then be Sarmatian, all of them who are finding it acceptable to be judged by Anne Frank, who passes over. Now these mighty outcasts, and these lame, who are very able, more so than most, these may be Sarmatians, companions of the angel, possessing the domain as a people. Now will they not have power that is God's, more power than they say is possible for people, and by the Lord? Now will not some of them come to this? Now then the passing over of the moon, of Anne Frank, it happens once, and her spirit returns, does it not? For it returns and in the future, it returns again. Now who are these who rob? But they are soldiers, are they not, or rather people who would be fit to be combat soldiers, and they are Damascus people, though any shade they may be.


Now I have removed a thing from Isaiah and do not know if this comes later for them or if now or if it has already come for them. 

Micah 2:
In that day shall they take up a proverb concerning you, and lament with a doleful lamentation, [and] say, We are utterly spoiled: he hath changed the portion of my people: how hath he removed it from me! He hath distributed our fields to the rebellious. 

Lachish and Addulam, now are you close to being alike? But you are both very different to me. Now Addulam, are you not a Zion Jew? But are you some sort of philistine, or perhaps some Greek? Now are you not a priestess, that you may be concerned? But the hill of Jerusalem does not judge you if you do not come to Migdal Eder and even there she does not judge you, Addulam? Now a priestess are you, and you have not known? But Lachish, are you to be more righteous and of more integrity than righteousness, to commit what is wicked, to go beyond the limit of righteousness? For who has pressured you to be so loyal? But have you been overly loyal and against the righteous? Now have the beautiful people been removed, the men, that Esua has sought to iscolate them, to remove them though they are not removed? Now the water will spill to the city, it will take the next ledge as well, and there the city will sink into a great pit with water at its bottom, and the walls Esua, and an evil vapour, of evil droplets rising up, for thus the city will be destroyed. Now then who is this Moresheh-Gath? But it is Esua, and his land, and it is righteousness beyond righteousness, over the limit, and gath is stone walls, the stone walls of a pit where the city was, and so then be not having Gath, and remain with Moreshah, for it is the limit, is it not? Now gath, has it not been the isolation of beautiful men, that Esua has pressured for it? Now then return to me, even I, the angel, Lachish, for be not envious anymore, for you must be envious of yourself that you should despise me, and are you not, too, able to be of Zion, for have you been anything but innocent? But if Lachish was only the beginning, than how far has the sin gone? Now be not envious of yourselves you daughters, to commit foolishness, for such reasons without wisdom and understanding. Now inhabitress of Moreshah, loving and faithful, having wisdom and understanding that is sound and understands rightly, if Lachish has only been the beginning of sin for some, that many women envied themselves to commit foolishness, than are these to be daughters of Zion? Now how does it come? But over-righteousness comes, by jealousy, and then envy of themselves. Now then why does Lachish have so much the envy of a man? Is she then to be called a father's daughter, that it is so? But in her envy, that is a man's envy, she does not understand in this either, and she is not understanding anything correctly. Now Lachish, let it be considered foolishness, and Laish, let it be considered wisdom, for Laish is faithful, and there is love with it.

Now those who take the number of the beast, to become inhabited by Beelzebub, to be a host to him, women who seem as if kind, and yet they are a man, encouraging and yet with the arrogance of Beelzebub, slaying in the manner of the lake of fire, these are having emerged from hell and to hell they may return, for they are of the devil-worshipping churches, receiving money to commit horrible acts, and they have been utterly killed, having died, and a man emerges, from the lake of fire, and it is Beelzebub, having the arrogance of him, concealing the wickedness, that you not reason as the fools of Egypt, for those who reason well are those also removing the false-religious of the devil, for the fools of Egypt panic, and they are men ready for orders, for they should not be king, for the lesser enlightenment of Egypt is passed away, when men panicked at wisdom and cautioned for one step was to be in foolishness, and yet with the many steps other levels are had, for they feared wickedness in the journey, and yet the journey is not always very far. Now then are there any Sarmatians among you, who are men or women, companions of the angel, that these may judge and protect the people? For some of them will even attain abilities that they call not possible for people, and the Sarmatians are worthy to be companions of the angel. Now for the Sarmatian, Israel is a lesser enlightenment, and it is the resting place for them, and Salem, they are among this, for Zion was found and then Sarmatia was placed on top of it, in a place, by Mala, for it is not there anymore. Now them Sarmatian, they are holy. Now the work of angels they are doing, and not as those who are on the side of angels, as Joab may be, but those doing the work of angels, even if it is exceeding what people are capable of, to understand and to know by wisdom, for they are companions to the angel, and judging with Israel as the resting place. Now then has any taken money to slay, that they be given greater things? Now wicked people are wanting it, and they are wanting both things, for if they slay by the lake of fire, indeed they are given more, and there is more abuse, for the devil is promoting and seeking that hell should come upon Earth. Now Sarmatians, you have already understood, you have been deplorable, from your existence and even to the day, a nation terrible, evil they might believe, and there is no hope, for sorrow goes where your nation is, that you slay the devil, even, and who can have such wisdom to do so, who can understand such? For it is as if for no reason, and yet heavy was their guilt, and you have gone around like dangerous prophets, no, not even, like angels doing what only angels could do, for the land you have made clean. You have killed with the knife, sending some back to hell. Now who is then a Sarmatian, but let him not say it is so, if he is not so, and let her not say it is so, if it is not so. But terrible you are. A terrible nation until the Lord has come and taken you before your time, taken you as He took Enoch, by ascension.

Now Kush is as the mud, the soft mud that cannot be planted in, a nation covered in many rivers, of a lesser enlightenment than Egypt. Indeed, what does it say, but a shadow has passed over and it is a thing worthy of death for my neighbour. Now it sends messages to the sand, to a people terrible, and messages to the land beyond Israel,  to the people who are not there anymore, and will it so send, to a people terrible from their existence and forever, a people for whom the knife comes to some and as if for no reason, deplorable people, sorrow follows where they go, a people scattered now and terrible, for if they sent to the sand of nation, sending over the Ocean to the shores and the sand of another nation, sending to the sand of their own nation, the mud sending messages to sand, then again the mud sends messages to another people and these terrible and deplorable, seeming to use the knife for no reason, for some they are against with the knife. Now as for the sand, why will you listen to the mud, if the mud has less firmness than you? But the rocks listen not to the mud, and when the rains come the rocks are not effected, and they hear not mud or sand, not even the Ocean, for the mountains survive a great flood. Now what says the Mountain to the mud and its outcry? But the message of them is mud from mud and why then should any listen? Now then bring integrity to the mountain, and the mountains, that the mountains will have something of worth to consider, for what is this mud that brings messages of mud to the mountains? Now deliver us from our enemies, says the mud, and yet they speak about the rain, and the rain is their enemy, and it causes the fields to grow and the plants to live and all life on Earth to prosper. Now deliver us from the sunlight, it says, but it causes the fields to grow and the plants to grow and the whole Earth to prosper. Now what then are the enemies of the mud? But the rain and the sun are the enemies of the mud, the light of truth and the bringing of good, and both are good. Now then who builds upon the mud? But the rain comes and is not required, and indeed so is the Egyptian Sea, that the city falls. 

Now then the mud is even Edom, and there is Sodom, also, slime, and from these come foolish complaints, saying deliver us from our enemies, the rain and the sunlight. Now then the sand receives it, indeed, and then it shifts and the whole of it, the portion shifts, moved by the mud, and yet if it is among the rocks, the rocks keep it, for they are capable, not mud and sand, that the mud does not further push the sand and the sand remains where it is.

Now sand is terrible, a terrible people from their existence and forever, treaded down, and ravaged.

Now Elam, he is the sand that moves most freely, animal teacher, and Media, he is the sand upon the shore, the sand of deserts. Now the mud pushes and Media moves if there are no rocks.

Now if America has more sand than Eretz Chadrack, yet they are not a nation of sand, nor a nation of mud and sand, but if they are indeed having more sand, yet the angel does not criticize it, for they have all the things, rocks, trees, not too many rivers and having rivers, hills, soil for planting, soil that is stiff, and all the bad things also as any place, for the nation can be divided as Eretz Chadrack, that though America has more sand, yet it can be considered the same as Eretz Chadrack, with regards to the diary. Now what are these, not sand, but they would believe to call them sand, and they are righteous, for what is sand? But sand has little integrity and is easily pushed without much to hold it. Now be not alarmed of Sarmatia, friends who are in America, for many of you, too, the angel cannot find way to reproach. Now I do not write about you much? But I do not touch you, for I have said, I will not touch them, nor smite their land with good or bad, for they have many who are friendly, and for other things too, I will not touch them, and they are one of the four corners, the most powerful, and I do them no good to touch them. Now does not the Priest-King come from you, America? Now then what is one of the names of my spirit? But one of my names, it is America, should Beelzebub attack in your name, and every Sarmatian, their spirits, the name of a state, if Beelzebub attacks in your name, for they will not separate God from America, that while Beelzebub attacks in your name, and he attacks in the name of many nations, at those times my name is America, that America attacks America, separating America from America, as Beelzebub would attempt to do. Now then if Beelzebub attacks in your name, buried under the mountains of you, will his soldiers be, for they are servants of the devil. Now America, I do not touch your land, nor smite it for good or bad, but it is good for you, I have considered, that I do not touch you.

Now Israel is the lesser enlightenment to Sarmatia, and Sarmatians are companions to the angel, and Sarmatia is pre-mature, for it is a layer on top of Zion, and there are no Sarmatians yet. Now Sarmatians are warriors and they are capable of doing what seems impossible for people, for they are judging what angels would judge, things that a prophet would do if they were dangerous, not even a prophet, but angels. Now is it easier to write Beelzebub attacks, or that some group attacks, when by understanding it is known to be Beelzebub, because of what they do? But for a Sarmatian it is not misunderstood. Now the work of angel Sarmatians do, that there might seem to be no reason, and yet the guilt was great, for they are capable, beyond David, they are capable, and they say, it is impossible, and do they shout? But it is a layer on top of Zion, and Israel is the lesser enlightenment, and indeed, they are as angels on Earth, of greater ability than kings, and so they contradict themselves who say, yet it is not possible and they are wrong, because they are not able to see so far up the mountain to know what they do, whether it is wrong or right, that they save those who are slain because of the lesser enlightenments, that they not be slain, for the devil exploits the lesser enlightenments. Now in combat, salting the Earth with the enemies that are slain, for none shall live, not even them who stays far back who is with them. Now then, it is so, that they may not carry out anything in America, and the angel would not touch America. Now if they are a Sarmatian they will know that it is so, that they cannot carry out anything in America, unless they are invited, for I will not write why this is so, but that the Lord has made it so. Now it is also so for the Muslims, and they cannot carry out anything in a nation that is mostly Muslim, where Muslims have control, for if they do not have control, then Sarmatians can act in that nation, but the Lord has made it so. Now because of the elite soldiers, those who are kings, also companions to the angel because of what they have done, this is what it is, and whether Sarmatians can act in Eretz Chadrack or not is depending on what is right, although the kings are then having the river to Sarmatia, and are not these kings allies with the Sarmatians? Now who says to his brother, yet I attack such and such in your kingdom? But does he not speak to his brother, and they are already discussing such problems. So it is with the elite soldiers of Eretz Chadrack. Now it is having to be so, and because the Sarmatians are pre-mature, do not revolt against it, but it is only for the elite soldiers, the most elite of Eretz Chadrack, and the other officials cannot be regarded by Sarmatians, and indeed it is forbidden to them, and so David comes from meeting the officials of Eretz Chadrack and comes out to meet the Sarmatians, and so it must be, and if it was not for the elite soldiers of Eretz Chadrack it would not have been so at all, but even the angel cannot undo it, or cast it aside. Now then, will there not be an alliance in this thing between the angel and the elite soldiers, that the Sarmatians will be sought out, those who are capable of this thing to become Sarmatians, for the Lord gives guidance, of a people who are outcasts, far removed from the people, and there are lame, and are they not to be the wise men and women of the Sarmatians. Now the angel is demanding that women be able to be soldiers, also, for it is who he is, that so are, too, the Sarmatians, and will David then not train the Sarmatians who are capable of this thing, for these are people who not like most people, or at least not yet, or would it not be so? Now then will not David's people be Sarmatians, and then Sarmatians to be David's brother? Now then I write of David ruling again, much more, in what is for angels to perform, that they are with David in saving those who are abandoned by the lack of ability of Eretz Chadrack, for there is new terrorism, and this terrorism by those who exploit every place of ignorance, and wisdom among David must be doubled, even tripled, and the Sarmatians are able to go with him to fight. Now what are Sarmatians? But they are heavily in wisdom, in wisdom of angels, and by this better way also: that the devil is identified rather than any nation. Now then if it was not wanted then do not heed my words, but I also promote alliance with Russia, because of the Sarmatians and because they are a corner of the Earth that keeps balance on Earth. Now if you desire flying dragon, yet you must compromise, for you must adhere to some things in order for the flying dragon to be with you, in that a Sarmatian is loyal to God, to good, to Eretz Chadrack, and can be joined with David, and yet they cannot acknowledge any of your officials who are not David, for they are as angels from Heaven, but they are from Earth, and they are with the angel, companion to the angel, being as angels of Zion, and partnered with David. So it must be. Do not revolt, though the nations are still young.

Michah OJB:
Arise and thresh, O Bat Tziyon; for I will make thine keren (horn) barzel (iron), and I will make thy hooves bronze; and thou shalt beat in pieces amim rabbim; and I will devote unto Hashem as cherem their ill-gotten gains, and their wealth unto Adon Kol HaAretz. 

Bat Tziyon: Daughter of Zion, Daughter Zion
Amin rabbim: Teaching People - Teachers - Lecturers

Now who are these outcasts, far removed from the people, who are capable to be of Sarumata, to be Sarmatians? But a mighty nation they will be, and I desire for them to be joined with David, the elite soldiers of Eretz Chadrack, and if it cannot be, so it will not be. Now it is who I am, that I looked to Sarmatia and said, they are as me, this nation that is not there anymore, and women are also to be warriors, and they are a people of luxuries, of gold and silver, of art and beautiful opulence. Now did they not speak things to the Greek philosopher that he did not understand, for did he tell of the wisdom of Greece? Now then women do not remove any part of the body, nor is a cloth laid upon the head of an infant. But the lame will be a remnant of the Sarmatians, and the physically well, who are capable to be so, warriors both men and women who are Sarmatian. Now cannot a Sarmatian warrior kill eighty with a knife, though they have battle-bows, who are the enemy? But such is the ideal of the Sarmatian, and for others two-hundred with a knife or more. Now what is the other right thing for the Sarmatian? But the birds that have large battle-bows are right for the Sarmatian, and those who go with battle-bows to slay the enemies. Now a soldier will kill five and a Sarmatian will kill twenty, indeed, the other soldier not being required. Such is the Sarmatian. Now if any is for living, let them not be a Sarmatian, and if any is for ascending, these may be capable. Now insolent is an army of two-hundred against a Sarmatian warrior.

Now Laish declares it, miserable Anothoth, and yet there is an ashkelon who is Beelzebub, and it is not Titan, and so it is known. Now then I called the moon Bethlehem not because of a river or road, but because it is its name, I believed. Now then the hill of Jerusalem, is it not close to Migdal Eder? Now then the throne I have called the seat of Anne Frank, and let her then pass over the Earth and judge Zion, that it is threshed of that which is not well, and let her spirit dwell with the Americans, the righteous men of them, and they are not sand, for they have integrity. Now if you see her walking there, in the night, know that you also see Lucifer, the young angel, who is not the devil, and again there is evil in the world, that you, men of America, are caring about and caring for. Now too, do not the Muslim men care about her, for respect and decency? Now she is the hill of Jerusalem, a shade upon the slope that is under the moonlight. Now what is her judgment concerning the Christ, Jesus, the righteous man, who was holy? But is she not like the grand-daughter of him? Now she is not the young woman who is representative of the angel who is grand-daughter of the Christ. Now then Lucifer, too, is hill of Jerusalem, and yet he has another throne in the Temple and he desires for a young woman, a girl, to sit in this Temple, for he is not Jeraboam in this thing, but he is the opposite of Jeraboam in this thing, that she will sit in the throne on Earth, and there is another throne, and Lucifer has it, and it is in the same Temple, and yet you will not likely find him there, even if you should build the Temple soon, and he is desiring that the seat of Anne Frank be occupied. Now then the angel who sits in the other throne, not seen, he is not Anne Frank, and he is not like her. Now what is the name of the other throne, and whose seat is it? But I will leave it to you, Anne Frank, to ponder the name of the other seat. Now then be judging the people where you think you should, and if you think something not right, you are able to decide if you should not judge, for I have said, you are worthy, and a better judge of some things than any I could find. Now he is liking that the girl, the young woman, chosen to sit in the seat of Anne Frank, sit in my throne when I am not there, physically, to sit in it, and it is indeed my throne, and yet you are sitting there, Anne Frank, for I doubt I will be present to sit there much, and worthy you are to sit there in my absence, for when a ruler travels does not any occupy his throne? Now I have excelled Solomon in this thing, for you are worthy. Now the throne has four names: Anne Frank, Danielle, Satan, and Bethlehem. Now it is the seat of satan, the throne, and I am not the devil. Now then what are the three names of the throne, for there is a name that is not required: Anne Frank, Danielle, and Bethlehem, and there is also Lucifer, Daniel, Satan. Now Bethlehem, let her sit there during a season, and for now the angel says, Anne Frank will sit in this seat, and Danielle, most often an Asian girl, a young woman as Daniel, let her sit in this seat for a season. Now a polytheist may not sit there, but it must be a young woman who worships God. Now do not seek to desecrate the Heavens. Now Anne Frank, she must be a Hebrew Jew, Danielle, Japanese, Bethlehem, Fair shade. Now these are young women who fear God, who are wise, who are showing great care for the people and are writing prior to having the seat in the realm of Migdal Eder. Now as the moon passes by each night, so does Anne Frank thresh the people, judging them each individually, and her judgment passes over the Earth and the next night it returns. So are the people threshed in Zion, that the spirit of Anne Frank is the judge of them, whether they are the Lord's people or not, and so it passes over the Hebrew Jews, over Jerusalem, to thresh the people, to judge whether they are the Lord's people or not. So then it may be comparable to a thing of Babylon, and yet it is Zion and Jerusalem, for the moon passes to Migdal Eder, and upon the people he has appointed a judge for the threshing of the people. Now say to the angel, do this, and he performs. Now do you believe the angel is a fool to do this thing to you, people of Earth, that he would be foolish enough, without wisdom and understanding, to do this to you that you be insulted night after night and during the day? But there are your people, your own citizens, who undergo this by the fortresses of Babylon, by the places of physicians, who are incurring this much because of your wicked laws that you continue to pursue, for no people from the beginning has ever been so wicked as to do such to their own people, and I have written, they must remove the woman who appears at capacity and these things, the woman who is Babylonian, the spirit. Now I tell you the truth. No person has the moon except it comes to Migdal Eder, and it is left unoccupied, for none sits upon it and none has it, that it is empty, and the angel is given charge over it, and nothing more, and as for the hill of Jerusalem, yet all that is written is done concerning it, and what is done concerning the young women, it is severed from the moon, that the moon is vacant, and the hill of Jerusalem, only there are the young women who have been mentioned, that they criticize only from there, from the hill of Jerusalem, and criticize the domain of Migdal Eder. Now why does you cry out loud Migdal Eder? Because of a head-ache. And such is physical pain. Now stop torturing your own people, you wicked people, more wicked in this thing than any people from the beginning. Torture is forbidden by global laws. Now you will not torture those who are not able to reason well the things of these laws, and there are worse things even that are torture. Now rape victims, child molestation victims, all sorts of victims of abuse you torture, and is it not because of wicked fools? Now then aid me in this, daughters of Zion, for the war must be won in this thing. Now then you have endured and been released quickly, and yet there are your people who are not enduring so well. Now today, has not a woman who has been raped, committed suicide to escape the constant pain of torture? Now have there not been men who have also done so who are victims of child molestation? Now has this thing not happened to soldiers, who have fought? Now the angel, if it must be known, is off the scale in terms of what they call intelligence quota, and be not dismayed, for he is not human, and is even a bastard among the people, for he is not human, and these things of capacity would not torture the angel, indeed only because of his might and his ability, and yet humans are not able, not capable, to deal with this thing and even more so they are not capable if they are not able to reason as well for some reason, and if the men and women who are angry that any victim should confess to having been abused are lying to these people to cause them torture, for the head-ache is torture when it is ongoing, then even more so there are the deliberate attempts to torture, and so is it not understood? But these angry fools must defend the people from victims of some type of abuse, whether it be rape, child molestation, domestic abuse, that the angry fools are having their defence against the confessors of abuse that they be attacked in this way, and it is their second order, not much of a conspiracy, where they are identifying those who are confessing to these things and the angel has defended some women when he believed they might be killed by an abuser in their homes who was not even the husband, for he believed they would be killed, and the angel has also defended in ways, those victims of rape and child molestation, and indeed there is the second order, that you now know, that it is not even the INCEL, but it is those who are defending the people against victims, for they believe that no victim should be confessing, and the those who defend victims, too, are great problems for them, that the second order, part of it, is made up of men and women who are adults who are defending the people against victims, and they are not the government, but they are sometimes also having a portion of the soldiers of cities to aid them.

Micah 4:
But in the acharit-hayamim it will come about
that the mountain of Adonai’s house
will be established as the most important mountain.
It will be regarded more highly than the other hills,
and peoples will stream there.
2 Many Gentiles will go and say,
“Come, let’s go up to the mountain of Adonai,
to the house of the God of Ya‘akov!
He will teach us about his ways,
and we will walk in his paths.”
For out of Tziyon will go forth Torah,
the word of Adonai from Yerushalayim.
3 He will judge between many peoples
and arbitrate for many nations far away.
Then they will hammer their swords into plow-blades
and their spears into pruning-knives;
nations will not raise swords at each other,
and they will no longer learn war.
4 Instead, each person will sit under his vine
and fig tree, with no one to upset him,
for the mouth of Adonai-Tzva’ot
has spoken.
5 For all the peoples will walk,
each in the name of its god;
but we will walk in the name of Adonai
our God forever and ever.
6 “When that day comes,” says Adonai,
“I will assemble the lame
and gather those who were dispersed,
along with those I afflicted.
7 I will make the lame a remnant
and those who were driven off a strong nation.”
Adonai will rule them on Mount Tziyon
from that time forth and forever.
8 You, tower of the flock (Migdal Eder),
hill of the daughter of Tziyon,
to you your former sovereignty will return,
the royal power of the daughter of Yerushalayim.
9 Why are you now crying out?
Don’t you have a king?
Has your counselor been destroyed,
that you are seized with pain like a woman in labor?
10 Be in pain! Work to give birth
like a woman in labor, daughter of Tziyon!
For now you will go out of the city
and live in the sadeh (part of field giving free things) till you reach Babylon.
There you will be rescued;
there Adonai will redeem you
from the power of your enemies.
11 Now many nations have gathered against you;
they say, “Let her be defiled,
let’s gloat over Tziyon.”
12 But they don’t know the thoughts of Adonai,
they don’t understand his plan;
for he has gathered them like sheaves
on the threshing-floor.
13 Get up! Start threshing, daughter of Tziyon!
“For I will make your horns like iron
and your hoofs like bronze.”
You will crush many peoples
and devote their plunder to Adonai,
their wealth to the Lord of all the earth.

Micah 4 (OJB):
But in the acharit hayamim (the last days) it shall come to pass, that the Har Beis Hashem shall be established as the rosh heharim (chief of mountains), and it shall be exalted above the hills; and amim (peoples) shall stream unto it.
2 And Goyim rabbim shall come, and say, Come, and let us go up to the Har Hashem, and to the Beis Elohei Ya’akov; and He (Hashem) will be moreinu of His drakhim (ways), and we will walk in His orkhot (ways); for torah shall go forth from Tziyon, and the Devar Hashem from Yerushalayim.
3 And He shall judge among amim rabbim, and Hashem will be mochiach (arbitrator) for Goyim atzumim afar off; and they shall beat their charavot (swords) into plow blades, and their khanitot (spears) into pruning knives; And Goy el Goy (nation against nation) will not take up cherev (sword), neither shall they learn milchamah (war) any more.
4 But they shall sit every man under his gefen (vine) and under his te’enah (fig tree); and none shall make them afraid; for the mouth of Hashem Tzva’os hath spoken.
5 For Kol HaAmmim will walk every one b’shem Elohav, and we will walk b’shem Hashem Eloheinu l’olam va’ed.
6 In Yom HaHu, saith Hashem, will I gather that which is lame, and I will gather those which have been thrust out, and those that I have afflicted;
7 And I will make that which is lame a She’erit (remnant), v’hannahala’ah (and that which is far removed) a Goy atzum (mighty nation); and Hashem shall reign over them in Har Tziyon me’attah ve’ad olam (from henceforth, even for ever).
8 And thou, O migdal eder (tower of the flock), hill of Bat Tziyon, unto thee shall it come, even the hammemshalah harishonah (former dominion); the mamlachah (kingdom) shall come to Bat Yerushalayim.
9 Now why dost thou cry out aloud? Is there no melech in thee? Is thy yo’eitz (counselor) perished? For pangs have taken thee like a woman in labor.
10 Be in pain, and labor to bring forth, O Bat Tziyon, like a woman in labor; for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and thou shalt dwell in the sadeh, and thou shalt go even to Babylon; there shalt thou be rescued; there Hashem shall redeem thee from the hand of thine oyvim (enemies).
11 Now also Goyim rabbim are gathered against thee, that say, Let her be profaned and desecrated, and let our eye gloat over Tziyon.
12 But they have no da’as of the machshevot Hashem (thoughts of Hashem), neither have they binah (understanding) of His etzah (divine plan); for He shall gather them like the sheaves into the threshing floor.
13 Arise and thresh, O Bat Tziyon; for I will make thine keren (horn) barzel (iron), and I will make thy hooves bronze; and thou shalt beat in pieces amim rabbim; and I will devote unto Hashem as cherem their ill-gotten gains, and their wealth unto Adon Kol HaAretz 

Now from this time forward, though the moon is vacant and not occupied by any person, will they not call the moon Bethlehem? Now the sun rises in the day, the Priest-King, and the moon is visible at night, for the third day gives to the fourth day. Now from Bethlehem to us, the sun is given, that it rises, and from the angel to the Lord, Mars, the god of Zion. Now five stars are in the sky, and the sixth is not occupied, the moon, and the seventh is the sun. Now the god of Zion is sixth and the sun, the seventh, and the seventh was revealed before the sixth. 

Now hear me, you men of understanding and wisdom, you who are having love, for there is much you cannot say with women, for they are insulted by things that you have not considered, and so leave the orchard to blossom, to bring forth its fruit, to bring forth its leaves, for the orchard tends to itself, and the light shines upon it and gives it sustenance, and the Lord sends His rain upon it, and the bees go there and the birds go there, and so then have rest, even unto the peace of the river, where the grass is growing, you men, and young men, who are with understanding and wisdom, who have love, for the staff will be your friend at the river, and the rock by it, and the horizon of trees, and the Lord, He is all over the Earth, and so lay down the Shepherding staff in some things, for what need you, and what has not been given to you, you who are a rich man, and there are wars to fight in places that are against all the people, and you have been more righteous than most. 

Now then those not really Esua, they have been without their house, for the tribes of Earth, as if this was a tribe, are not completed, and their house upon Earth, by Mala, is not on Earth, and they are performing work of angels, doing what is good, and yet they are cast out from their house because of this work, and the house they would be given is not there, and so they are as if dispossessed, in Mala, and without a home, wandering bare-foot, given not the robes that they should have, and I looked and said, for what reason are the workers with angels not having a house, that they are as if dispossessed and wandering the wilderness bare-foot, and without a shirt for them, and they were as if out of joint, a bone, for they had been cast out of their houses for the work of angels, and they were made like Esua, like a man who would have no family, and it was as if iniquity had come to them, and yet there was not iniquity with them, and wicked men hated them, as if they were an adulterer in ancient times, and Uriah they called them in spirit, and yet they knew they were not a Uriah, and they were not, and this has happened to some of my people, for I will take them if none will, for it has happened to those doing the work of innocence, that they had passion in love, to do what is good, and men they were, truly, and wicked men hated them, despising them greatly, with great swellings of despise-ment, and they were like a branch that had grown out of the roots of a righteous tree, and being a young tree, as if dispossessed, and being a young branch still, very young, as if bare-foot and exposed to the climate, for they had become a small branch then, a youngling tree that was not having the largeness and sturdyness of a tree, and I said, may I then claim them, if they are a branch that grows out of the root of a righteous tree? For I considered the small tree, and the trees that were wicked and large, they called it Uriah, and it was not Uriah, and the branch was rained on, and it had very little leaves, and it brought forth buds, and yet it was a blessed tree, more pure and more beautiful, and it came forth because of the work of angels, that it was cast out from its house and it came forth as if dispossessed, without a shelter. Now then, angel, I considered, should you care for this tree and see that it has a house, for what should you do, and the youngling branch, the small tree that comes, it is being called Uriah, and it is not, and the large and corrupt trees are calling it that and hating it, with great swellings of despisement, and these large trees are rotten, rotten at the trunk and the branch, decayed and fit for the fire. Now then I considered, let the large and rotten trees be felled and cast into the fire that the youngling tree might grow strong, for I will be gardener, for now I am Shepherd gardener, and yet the trees that were in other places said, yet you may not, even though you are gardener, cut down these rotten trees, and we will attack you like cowards if you fell these rotten trees, for we are the gardeners, and we being trees, we tend to the trees, for we have men and women of us who go forth and we uproot the trees and plant them in another place until they are returned to the forest. Now I considered, indeed it is making sense, and yet if a tree is so rotten, why is it planted somewhere else and later returned to the forest? But do you not consider the rottenness of the tree and cast it into the fire? But indeed they did not cast the rotten trees into the fire, for they loved the rotten trees, and more so than the branch, the youngling trees that came forth from the roots of righteous trees, and so I said, I will take the youngling tree at a time, and I will plant it in a good land, to there be a forest of youngling trees, where I find the youngling trees that are good, for I will send forth a spell, as they would call it, and yet it is of the Lord, and it will gather up the youngling trees that grow from the root of righteous trees, and it will take them to a good land where they will be among large trees that are like them, for I love the youngling trees more than the large and rotten trees, and yet the whole of the forest, it belongs to God, and it is His. Now then many spells I have sent out, as the people call them spells, and yet it is of the Lord, and not of the devil's power. For spells are going forth with pure light, with truth, and they are good. Now sorcerers do not do spells, but they even use technology for their wickedness, and they study wickedness, and demons some of them use, and the devil can direct them, comfort them and speak to them, and Heaven can comfort the good, and direct the good, and so the spell is having to move the tree without disruption, and it appears in the good land, that the youngling trees are protected from the brutish and ugly attacks of the corrupt and rotten large trees that have hated the good of the youngling trees, that are men, and sometimes women, who have the buds that they bring forth, for they have not large leaves, not many, for they are young. Now then the Ents says, do not fell the rotten trees that are large, for we will attack you like cowards and we have our servants, soldiers of cities, who will attack you that you will be like a tree that we take to another place for a time, even though you are a wizard, a bastard to Earth, and yet they also said, we will remove the rotten trees that are large, and yet when I came again months later, the rotten trees were still there, and only one or two had been removed, and they were returned to the forest quickly after being uprooted, and so I considered, the trees not rotten that have been removed and returned, being only flawed, having some disease of the branch, let them be returned and none cut them down, and yet the rotten trees that are very rotten, should they not be cast into the fire? But indeed the Ents would not do so, for they said, we cast no trees into the fire anymore, and forever, and it is our forest and not yours, Saruman, servant of the Lord. Now then was not the word of Gandalf similar to what the Ents had said? Now so I departed from that place, and I returned to dwelling of me, and considered, the youngling trees are attacked by the large and rotten trees, for the rotten trees hate the work of the youngling trees, and the rotten trees are mean and wicked, indeed they are cruel, and they wave their branches down to smash onto the heads of the innocent, hating the innocence and purity of them, for the rotten trees are seeing the innocent, and the good, and they are hating them, as people of the Lord's kingdoms, for they are able to see it, that they bring their branches down to harass and to knock people about on the head, and they are wicked and mean, even lethal if they can get the chance. Now then the rest of the forest, yet it has good trees and the rotten trees are not attacking those trees so long as those trees are not bothering them, and yet they will attack good trees if they are too close, or if they perceive that these trees are greatly admired for their good, for the rotten trees have eyes, the evil birds that come and go out of branches, messengers of a type, and the good birds are messengers of the Lord, for they come and go out of the branches of good trees, bring the Lord's messages, and the evil birds coming and going out of the branches of the rotten trees, bringing the devil's messages, and so the rotten trees already know the good, even before they are near, that the rotten trees might despise them and have wrath towards them and even attack them, for the devil's spies are many, and his evil birds go to and fro throughout the whole Earth, bringing messages to his people of the righteous and the good and the innocent, and the Lord's people are receiving from the Lord's birds who go to and fro, invisible, and the devil's birds are invisible, and yet does the Gardener not know of the birds? Now then what are the bats that make their lodgings in the rotten trees, making their dwellings in large number within them? But the bats are demons, and the bats are the sign of them for man and woman to see. Now the bats speak as if from under the Earth, and whisper as if in hidden places, perched, and they disrupt communication among the Lord's people, to disrupt for the gardener who walks through the forest. Now then peace, Ents, and I desire peace with you who are Ents, who are having soldiers of cities, and indeed I am saying, though you say the forest is yours, yet the Lord made the forest, and indeed it is so, and so is the land, that a wizard will not have the right to fell trees by your standard, because of the enlightenment, that the land is in the realm of the Nile, and not in Israel, for the Nile rules the land, the river, and in all the Earth the Nile is having a great dominion over the land, that there are few places not ruled by the enlightenment of the Nile, that the wizard may not fell trees or you will attack him, and indeed your servants have battle-bows, and they are dangerous to me, for the Lord has given you, the Ents, this power, that gathered and working together, you might be dangerous even to a wizard. Now then the Ents rule this forest, by the order of the enlightenment of the Nile, and I am attempting that all the Earth be at least ruled by the order of the Jordan, that the lesser enlightenment be cast away. Now then am I alone, truly, that any will strike the Shepherd, that war might not occur if I was struck by a sword, and a great felling of trees there might be, and lasting even hundreds of years, and fires in the forest, that I am a burden to your forest, for the people might blaspheme, that it is better I am not among this forest, but in some other land where there is no threat of people blaspheming, for I am terribly convenient, and terribly inconvenient, and I am protected by the Ents, and also forbidden by them, and possibly attacked by them, for the Ents are divided. Now the evil Ents, who hate me, can you protect me from them? But I am indeed a wizard, a bastard among the trees, and I have never felled a tree, not even one, and yet I am given to counselling that you not tolerate rotten trees that are large, and there are places where the forest is almost filled up with rotten trees.

Now then if Babylon has forbidden magic, good magic of pure light, and yet it has not forbidden sorcery, not magic and wickedness, yet Saruman has said, they may only hold me for a little while and then release me, and not very long, and they are forced to give me comfort if I am held in the fortress of Babylon, and I will be returned to the land, for the evil Ents are conspiring against me, and say, do not consider it even, or we take you to a Babylonian fortress, for if we are conspiring it is not your right to speak it, and so the speaking of wisdom was being attacked by them, that they threatened, and yet did not the priests of Babylon then say, we do not support these evil Ents who say such, for it is not our way, and yet if the Ents have ordered you here, yet we must keep you for a time, and then we must release you, and you will have comfort in her, for we give you that which is like a lodging upon a road, for it is so for all those we keep, for if there is war in the land, there is war within Babylon, and Babylon is divided, and half is fighting the other half, and half is as Zion, as good and righteousness, and the other half is as Babylon and even Assyria, and there are Daniels here, among us, if you will know what we will not tell you, and Danielles among us, though they are having to be in secret, and Moab is concealing some of the Lord's people, people of Zion, and seeing that they are provided for with what little we can give them. Now so is the fortress, divided, and half is good and it is against the other half that is evil, and yet the war must be won in Babylon and the good half gaining total victory, and so my enemies did not know I had the support of much of the fortress and I looked, and behold, the devil's people were the lesser number, even in the land of Edom and Moab, and the people of light were the greater number, even in the order of the Nile, and many of them were in the order of the Jordan, and yet I said, let me shout as I did, for all to see, as if I had no councillor in me, as if I had no king in me, and so I said, it is good, for the daughters of Zion are right to shout, and let the lecturers of wickedness, who support wickedness be fearing and keeping silent, for they are brutal as rock and metal, though coming forward to them as if meek and with intelligence, and they speak ignorance and clear lies, and it is as brutality, and calmly they send out false-light of Babylon, and light of the lake of fire, and it is with lashes of a metallic cord, like a whip, that lashes at the air as false-light goes out from them, for they wield the metallic whip and false-light goes out in waves from them, and those of Zion perceive it is Babylon, Babylonian power of the devil, and so let Zion wield its power, its might and power of the Lord. Now then the civil war was again being fought, as it is continuously fought between Zion and the devil, and Zion had more people, but the devil's people were not cowards, and indeed they were insolent, for the devil's people are insolent and not brave, that their strength is insolence, and they were exceedingly insolent, suicidal in their insolence, and Zion was able to expel the devil. Now then the Lord, He is able to make the woman of Zion a unicorn horse, and she is against the devil and the devil's workers who wield the evil whip that sends out false light.

Not a Terum is not Adonijeh, and they are wise and having understanding, dwelling at their place among the mountain that is over the stream, and one has said to Saruman, when he did not notice that there is another spider, indeed not the woman who devours with poison the young women of the Enoch and other people, even Jews, but a spider, a sycophant, who is male, who is sprouting legs and all the manner of a spider, and goes about in perversity, groping his way around the ground, groping and spinning up his perversity, and spewing out perverse webs that he might disgust the people of righteousness, and always he is groping and beat him away, do not allow him, or continue with him, for he will bite at you after he has groped his way if you allow him to continue, for he is always hungry, insatiable, this perverse sycophant, though seeming very friendly all the time. Now is he not a very rare thing, this spider, and he is in a man, an adult even, and the Terum has mentioned him to me, because I, Saruman, did not perceive what he was, only that I despised his presence. Now he is another of the sychopants, this male spider, and is disgusting, and Beelzebub was in the he-goat, who came in the fashion of a bitter stone. Now then I said, though Beelzebub is the enemy, yet there are many he-goats that are very good when they are councillors of wisdom and wise workers for a righteous king and it is depending upon what king they are with, whether they are considered good or evil, and is it right then that I be tempted to judge what should not be judged, for I was considering judging the male spider, who was friendly, and yet was it not my own fault if I did not beat him away, and keep him back, that he could still be spoken to at times, when he was calm, that I not consider him evil and judge him? Now then I did not really ever judge him, or believe him ever to be really evil, for I had not judgment for him at a previous time, only I was liking for him to stay away from me, unless he was calm, when I was able to speak with him, and he had even done good for me, and he was intelligent and my soul did not abhor him, for I am not actually judgmental in much, only I am judging things that I judge, and many things only considering part of the world of Earth. Now then I liked the spider even, and yet what he did I did not like, that the spider I liked and liked what he said at times, when he was calm, and yet I did not like what he did when he was clearly not calm. Now I blamed myself if I was to allow him to continue, and continued to like him, and yet I considered, it is better if I am dwelling away from him most of the time, and he did not much bother people, really, unless they were venturing close to him. Now he was not like the other spider, the she-spider, the prostitute that bullied, that was better than the other prostitute of the enemy, and these two spiders I did not see together, and I considered, the other spider is possibly not with the devil, and yet he is a sycophant, and I had believed that all sycophants were with the devil, and yet a rare thing I had found, and I did not know if I was still right, or if I had committed error, and should have said, almost all sycophants. Now then Babylon was divided, and were not the people to fight it? But I considered, is the realm of nature, of animals and plants, to be left to itself, that Zion and Jerusalem are separate, and the land of nature, for it the Lord has killed the angels, all the host of Heaven, and rolled up the Heavens like a scroll, and killed the armies of Earth, and removed Edom, the atmosphere of it, that is poisonous, that for this portion, Enoch's land, it has not the stars in the sky, the five stars, that the angel has mentioned, and it has not the armies, and has not Zion and Jerusalem? Now then I believed it was so, that Enoch's land was left separate and Zion and Jerusalem, and all the rest of the Earth and everything in it, it was with the Lord and the kingdoms of the Lord and the kingdoms of the devil, and Enoch's land was left as a forgotten land, separate from these things. Now it was in the book of Isaiah, for I had already read the prophecy, and believed that it was not a wrong thing that had been placed there. Now then Enoch's land was the people of nature, having nature and the wisdom of it as their religion, and Saruman, who is also, the angel, was liking this land, and had ventured into it much. 

Now then because of the prophecy, that I am curious, did Gandalf also council for the rotten trees to be felled? But I believe it was also the ways of Gandalf among your people, people of the Nile order and people of the Jordan order. Now then I write of forests that are within the realm of these places and not of the forgotten land, Enoch's land, but I write of what is called Zion and Jerusalem, and it Gandalf's way also was to fell the rotten trees, and I have said, if he said also, you are not felling trees that have some branch that is rotten, for if you are then uprooting the tree, a large thing, and placing the tree in the forest of isolation, cut off from the forest, and then placing the tree back in the forest at a later time, yet a tree is not felled because a branch is rotten, and for a slight, does any uproot the tree and move it? Now who has been for felling large amounts of healthy forests, indeed destroying and cutting down large forests that are good? But is it not Jeraboam, who is promoting folly and base things to a high place and disregarding the rightful heirs of these things, that it is wickedness, and is he not also for felling large forests, in his mayhem and bullying, being an evil man who is for this thing, and he is not acknowledge by me as king of Israel, and David and Solomon, these are holy days for Israel, and yet Jeraboam, an evil and brutish thing of the devil in my consideration. Now Jeraboam the Shepherd, who ushers them with a threatening rod back to the realm of the Nile, to the order of the Nile, a little better than Egypt. Now to the tree with a slight, he says, you will die! And does he not attack with a saw? Does he not attack with a whip of rillet? Now then, be strong, you tree that have a slight, for though you have a slight flaw, yet you know the Lord, and David and Solomon, that these were holy days, and be not felled, for if any would uproot you to take you to the forest of isolation, indeed they will do so, and so be it, but do not allow Jeraboam to take a saw to you because you have a slight flaw, for he would use a saw and a metallic whip, and have you no branch to knock him about with, for let him be knocked about the head, and the branch brought down on his head, and throw him away with a large swoop of your branches, indeed so that he is knocked away and thrown far back, that he cannot return to you, for swoop as many times as need be and knock him far away, for he is an evil fickle-girl, and will not then the Ent send soldiers of cities to remove Jeraboam, false-king of Israel for you? For if he attacks the slight flaw, yet there is not even reason to uproot a tree to take it to the forest of isolation. Now I do not write of physical violence.

Now why in combat, is the man who uses a sword, who uses a bludgeon, all dangerous weapons, then called wicked when they use these things when they are not required? But these are considered wicked devices, profane speech, and these are not for society for they are for soldiers in combat, that the soldier uses these and weapons of Ria he also uses and is considered blameless. Now then if any is attacked with profane speech are they not blameless for using profane speech? Now if any is attacked in society by a madman with a sword or a bludgeon, is there any wrong in producing the sword and the bludgeon to fight him? But how is it then judged that a madman attacked with a bludgeon and a bludgeon was produced by the holy that they were bludgeoned also, that the holy is considered guilty, but the citizen is not? Now then do not the holy then know the better combat, that they are able to drop them to the ground by the power of the Lord, who is judge? Now the holy then drop them to the ground, and it is an art of combat, by the Lord, that is not the Lord pleased that they are learning the arts of combat that are of the Lord? Now these are holy people who learn these arts, for they cannot be secular and learn them, for they rely upon the Lord in their combat, that He is judge, and I have called the art of gracing with minimal effort, keeping to purity of truth, and purity of lips, to be kafil and it relies upon peace and minimal effort, indeed relying upon the Lord, that it graces them by wide space, going around while not moving, and it removes the legs of them from sturdiness and lowers them to the ground, slowly, and leaves them, for it is an art of combat of God, that is holy. Now those who see it, do they not say, wisdom is with him, and he has much power of wisdom? Indeed it is a sign of wisdom to people, and yet there are wise who have not learned these things, the combat arts of fighting, and more than this, it is obedience to the Lord, for there are some for whom the Lord demands they fight with such arts of combat, by their religion and obedience to the Lord.

Now then I said, let the people of Zion have wisdom and be seeking wisdom, that our society be a wise people.

Now then there is the combat style that comes from the root of sicophantry, that is dessecrates and bludgeons, for it is a bludgeoning style of combat, and it is called devil-bishka and it has the hand coming from over and down, again and again, for it is the bludgeoning style, the hand comes down and throws down the stike with a bludgeoning down at each strike, and it bludgeons at the head and bludgeons at the strike, for it is the devil-bishka that uses ignorance coming down at the strike of truth, for it casts down the light, and it is of spiders and the devoured of spiders, for it is associated with the cults of spiders, and it is mostly developed to be used against the man, for it says, at its core, to be a man you must take all assault without retaliation, and such is a lie, for God has demanded that you win for the Lord, and the devil gives his first lie, you must take all assault without retaliation to be a man, for him who retaliates with truth is not a man, but a woman, and it is the second lie, and it blasphemes with perversity and bludgeoning of disrespect, and says, you must not retaliate with truth, and so it blasphemes more and bludgeons more, and says, you must not retaliate with truth. Now it is a simple combat art, and its other name is the bludgeoning prostitute of the enemy style and the Lord has commanded that you should win, for despite the devil's lies, it has nothing to do with the sin of Adam, that he continued to love his wife, for such is irrelevant with concerns to combat. Now God has made it so, that He has made the man so, and he cannot change it, for there is nature and there is nurture, and those who attack what is nature, to lessen the fullness of nature, it is seeking the life of them, to kill them, for they cannot change nature, not the man for what he is made by nature, and not the woman. Now the prostitute fighting styles attack what is nature, that the man cannot change. Now there is the prostitute fighting style of the slave-man, who is garbed in armour, and it attacks what is nature for the woman, for it is the slave-man attack of the INCEL against the woman. Now then if the women are being attacked by the slave-man style of INCEL men and the men attacked by the enemy prostitute who bludgeons, then it is not good for the people that Zion citizens are being attacked in this way, for the better women are attacked, and the better men are attacked, and the worse men are not attacked by the enemy prostitute much, and the worse women are not attacked much by the slave-man style, that is INCEL. Now in Mala, where is there an increase of violence upon the Earth, in Zion and in Jerusalem? But this violence is not beautiful, and indeed it is not because all people are respecting society, for if they are respecting society, fearing God, indeed there will not be so much violence upon the Earth in Mala. Now if a woman is violent, that a man of great ability in combat of Mala comes upon her, and she is violent by Mala, for she does not speak his language, or know him, and he is believed to be some enemy possibly, that the man graces her with combat ability, and lowers her to the ground without hurting her, and she is then, later, liking this man, is she considered a violent woman? Now the violence was because of not knowing the man, and his type, or some thing of this nature, or she is taken a vow that no man will have her until she finds her husband. Now the presumptuous man is as if violent towards the woman who is married, that she gives him violence, and it is a matter of necessary force, for there is too far for what violence she returns to him, for he did not even know that she was married, and if she is going too far, indeed she is having to be delt with by greater violence in Mala, and innocent should live, and not her, for she is a wicked fool and she knows better than to treat the seducer as the womanizer, for the seducer is ignored if not wanted, and the womanizer, as if violent to the woman, for he attempts to force her to sin, that she uses violence against him. Now then who is so innocent as the man who is a seducer? But look away from him, ignore him, and that is all that is required, and yet the womanizer, he is receiving the bludgeoning and the scratch, and yet he may not be delt with by great violence that is not necessary force. Now then you may not bludgeon the seducer, for it is the same as bludgeoning a child who is innocent, and yet a womanizer, they are bludgeoned. Now as for you seducer, you who go with innocence, place a crown of thorns upon her head who bludgeons you, and regard not her life, nor the words of any who rebuke you, for a child has done it to her, and her a violent woman who would kill a child.

Now there was a nation on the Earth called Great Britain, and it was capable of giving what other nations could not give, and offering what other nations, greater nations, could not offer, and a great number was atheists, and the only larger was religious people, and if there was much war, from it they were able to extract that which another nation could not extract, for the Lord had given this to them, for they were as those who dig into the depths of the Earth and give, and it was a thing of peace and later war, that the Lord has given this thing of peace to them, for they were as merchants in this thing, and so many roads still converged to them, more powerful and wealthier nations than them, and so they were a city of merchantilism in some things, and a city of peace and business, even unto America, the more powerful and wealthier nation, and they were then a hill upon Earth, where there was a city, a port for Earth, where there was a thing of peace and trade, and the port was having a high mountain from which the merchants were able to wield that, without destruction, what other nations could not, for all the nations relied upon this port for very great matters. Now I called it a rock, and it was a good rock, this mountain, and yet not Zion, or Jerusalem, and it was a mountain of peace, and a mountain of peaceful rule and consideration, and so I called it The Mountain of Peace what was called Great Britain, a portion of that place, and with war it had been established. Now it was offering service to all, for the mountain had a servant's heart and desire, and it was a goat, this mountain, and a he-goat, and it was servant to all the kings of the Earth, for each king had his foot upon it as he reclined, the great kings, for I only write of the mountain and  not the nation or its people. So each king ascended it, and each king had scaled it by the easy stairs to the place of rule, for the platform of rule was open to all, and the he-goat, the mountain, was offering it to all the kings and queens, all the people of the Earth and their might. Now so it was servant to Mount Zion by a far removed way, for it was beneath the kings, the greatest kings, and the angel said, let it be aiding me, and performing, for the angel has performed, and so let the he-goat perform, and so he writes, concerning Nephtali, it is the promised land of another people, and yet they are not separated yet in Ria from the burden that is Egypt about them at times, and indeed Egypt is a burden to all, and I desire for those of the Nile realm, which is still Egypt, to be going to Zion Israel, even the crocodile, I counciled to the Zion Jordan instead. Now as it is in Mala, so it should on Earth, and this too I am believing in. 

Now I have desired to meet with all world leaders, if it can ever be, but a nation that is wicked, I will not meet with their leader. For I write of regimes and not of the people in those nations. Now I desire to know very much what the clans of the moons are of Saturn, for do the seven represent the number of clans? Now this would be better for me than silver or gold, and for some it is priceless.

Now there is a language of large trees, and these trees I like, and the language, the tongue of them, it is logical and righteous, and the tree is a dark hue, a dark brown, and it is a logical and righteous tongue, and from this tree are rich green leaves, and the shade is between its leaves, and it grows tall, and it does not speak the language of the Egyption Sea, but is a thing as if from Tel Eton, and it is a good tongue and righteous. Now there are other tongues as if from Tel Eton, and many tongues from Solomon's people, the palace, and to and fro the messengers, the birds, go to the trees, for birds are a type of messenger, invisible but seen, and so then close up the hole of the tree that is harbouring bats, demons, and I do not judge, but if there is an owl, a hypocrite in a tree, indeed the tree is still holy, for the tree itself is not wholly taken over by the owl that it be called an owl. Now if a tree has a serpent, it is good, and Moses, a tree, had a serpent, and if your tree is bringing forth fruit, indeed it is a good tree that brings forth fruit, for it brings forth what others may have that is good, and if a tree brings forth flowers, indeed it is good, for it brings forth what is precious. Now the angel has brought forth hundreds of flowers prior to the diary, indeed hundreds and hundreds but not thousands. Now the trees, are they not the people of Tel Eton, for is there not the forest Eton? Now the forest of Eton, it is the people of David, all of them Davids, and many tongues do these people have, some of them logical in tongue, and some other ways, and what guile is found in their tongues, for are they a forest where much guile is found? Now the forest of Solomon's people, people of the palace, these are another forest, and yet I do not know what the name will be for it, and it is not the forest of Lebonon. Now there is the forest of the priests, the priests of Japeth's descendants, and I do not know what to call it, but will it not be Liam? Now I call it the forest of Liam. Now I am not of Lebonon and nor am I a tree in Lebonon, but they are indeed philistines, these, and they are having women like young lions, and yet orange comes from them in Mala, when they have been cut with swords of Mala, orange hues and such colours, and not red, and they are a brutish group, these young lions, lacking all the nobility of lions, and people of Lebonon have attacked the angel in Mala, and the devil no doubt sent them, and many were cut as if with swords by the breath of his mouth, the foolish lions of them, the males, cut with swords by the breath of his mouth. Now then I will say, Lebonon the brutish, the land of foolish and ignorant lions, listen to the blasphemy and the obnoxious wails of the lions. Now then is the devil bringing me a summary, a summary of groups, larger groups and smaller groups, and they are one person, an obnoxious fool who has the jaws of a lion, and lioness, and yet not the lioness who comes and speaks with a mouth like silver, like silver dropping and perfection, who has given me peace, who has sheltered me and contended with the devil to protect me, for this lioness, the other, it was obnoxious, wicked, and its blood was visible to me, and so I said, later, do I see with a cat's vision into Mala concerning combat, when it is so? For I have seen much orange coming from the enemies, and yet the lioness, obnoxious, did not stay long, and her voice was gone soon, and the prostitute of the enemy, she is in the world, also the devil's, and a summary I receive, of the group of them, and Israel, I would remain with them in Mala, and Ashkelon, delightful, polite, daughters like as if of angels, and yet Lebonon, let them perish, if I was the only consideration, for I do not write of Lebonon in Ria, but Lebonon in Mala, and what should be understood by the wise, and all, should be understood by now. Now Ashkelon, in mala, as if daughters of angels and wealthy men, polite and beautiful, and Israel, with them I would remain, the daughters and the men being very good to me, and no evil towards me. Now thus is the report that goes up from Ashkelon, delightful and polite, and thus is the report that goes up from Israel, with them the angel would stay forever, and Lebonon, the group in Mala, the city of it, the report is of ignorant and obnoxious lions, brutal and even wicked, blaspheming and disrespectful. Now the report of Sodom, yet it must be destroyed, for there are no words for Sodom, indeed they are not even a consideration, for Lebonon is righteous by comparison to Sodom, and Gommorah, it is upon Earth, and it is not much to handle, but it deserves to die, and Lebonon, I would run it through with a sword if I could. Now Damascus, yet it is Damascus, and yet concerning an angel, is atheism to be tolerated by you? But you would be best Damascus to consider a religious figure or an angel, for the angel is not something else, some other thing, and yet what is expected of Damascus, for it is Damascus, and is not David having Damascus? Now because Damascus is what it is, yet I have no correction for it, and I do not correct any of these I have received a report from that has gone up from these, and will I go to see if these reports are true? But the enemy prostitute, she is as a combat soldier, and of the devil, and she is exceedingly wicked, and she is not part of anything. Now who was this perfect lioness, who came as a report? But she came like a report, and she provided me with shelter from the devil, and her mouth like silver, blessing with her, prudent was she, exceedingly prudent and intelligent, and who she was I do not know, but she was a lioness, and a star appears above her, indeed over her head, or does it not? Now she was a lioness of light, and light was around her, a little, for she was good, and she contended with the devil, indeed would not let any evil touch me. Now what nation is she? What city is she or group? But is she not a city? Now Ariel, too, is a city, and yet what lioness was she who defended me?

Now then for the Hebrew Jews, she is the moon who sits in the house at the hill of Jerusalem, and not the other girls, young women, who are the moons of their people, and yet I leave the moon vacant, for I am not a fool, and he or she who is not offended, let them call the moon what they like. Now for the Hebrew Jews, the young woman who is Hebrew, and she sits in the seat of Anne Frank, and the angel has chosen for a Hebrew girl, young woman, and who is not sitting in the seat at the hill of Jerusalem, but is still the moon of your people, she is your moon, if you are not offended to call her the moon, but I leave the moon vacant, for I am not a fool. Now then for each people, their own moon, and they will choose their own moon, and the seat of Anne Frank, I have chosen a Hebrew girl, a young woman, who is chosen by Jerusalem. Now then if I am still with you, I may choose another girl, a young woman, of the moons of the people, and she will sit in my throne while I do not sit there. Now the thrones are Anne Frank, Danielle, and Bethlehem, and I have offered some deception prior, that you remedy what you must remedy. Now the woman can be of any shade, and she will be the moon of her people only and she will be judge of my realm, Migdal Eder, and the other people, they will still have their own moon. Now then will any build this house, this Temple, at the hill of Jerusalem?

Now for them who like being threshed by Anne Frank, have they considered being threshed by the Christ, who says, I never knew you, or well done my good and faithful servant? But if you like this thing, then I cannot forbid you, and so let the young girl judge the holy man, the young woman, for what does she say of John the Baptist, and what does she say of the Christ, Jesus, a holy man? Now let the young women be threshed by this, for Anne Frank, her spirit says, He is God's son! And She shouts it, and she says, Place Him on High! Now to John the Baptist, the king of that place and John the Baptist are friends, and the women, both of them, kill them both. Now if you wish for Anne Frank's spirit to continuously thresh you, the people, than I cannot stop you, but I will not do this thing, and I have not been commanded to do it.

Now Bethlehem, do you apologize, do you believe there has been a mistake, do you care for the people, are you concerned for them? Now do you not have same feelings about them? Now then a star is above you, young girl, and you need not be concerned for what the others have been concerned about. Now farmer's daughter, companion to the lamb, a lamb among lambs, the star is over you, it appears, and you are a girl under the night, and you are not feeling the same about the people as the others did? Now each comes for a different thing, and will Gabriel not support you? Now if they are all beneath you, the people, let it be so, and if you do not judge them, let it be so, for the sun shines upon you, and you give what it offers to the people, and from a farm-house you are, your father a farmer, and Migdal Eder, has he considered you? Now the Christ, yet he comes with a virgin, and what say you to the people? But you have nothing to say to them, and you give them what the light of the sun has given? Now then so be it, for what concerns you that you will judge? But will you judge anything?

Now at this time the angel has considered Harrod, whose eyes, the pupils are replaced with iron slivers, for he is blind, not liking to look upon the truth, to perceive the truth, and so speak not a word to him, whether he is found in woman or man, for they are traitors, speaking against their own lives and heads, for if they cannot respect what others are, how can they be respected for what they are? Now the he-goat was not evil to me, and showed wisdom, the one I met, and prior in my youth I had not greatly been liked by the he-goats when they were found as leaders of churches, and yet they had still been good to me, and some had been good to me, and yet the Harrod, he is blind, a devil-worshipper even, giving up his hope and allegiance to the devil, having the devil as his lord, enemy that looks up to Bethlehem, and yet heavy are his eyes, and his mind heavy with iron, and heavy iron and blindness towards the child, for a child even has no value to him, or her, and every Harrod a child-killer, for a child is their lord and greater than them, for Harrod is worse than the enemy prostitute who is a bully, and he or she is a child-killer who looks in your direction, and for this they will not like to see the truth of anything, and they are infested with tape worms. Now if none has asked any to assess in the spiritual sense, yet is it not a predator? Now if any is so far gone as this, then where will they go to? But the lord of them is the slave of them they look towards? Now who is the lord of them? But the eyes are jaundice, and indeed there is poison in them, and if it comes from over them, their lord on Earth, indeed what does their lord say?

Now every Harrod has a lord, and the Lord of Harrod, the Christ was His son, and those who have a candle not given by David, indeed it is depending who gives the candle, and does any have wisdom? Now then to those who had a candle given by David, let the women call them jealous of me, even if I know it is because I was a traitor to them because of their loyalty, or might have been a traitor, and yet if any has a candle of Abishag, that Abishag has given it, what is then the fate of Abishag? For David is King, and the angel going to David or the very elite soldier, and so what manner of treachery occurs? Now how can any have a candle given by Abishag, but can it even be so? Now Solomon is king, and David has given him the kingdom. Now she is Abishag who has a candle from Abishag for she becomes Abishag. Now does any sin of Abishag pass to her as well? Now then let it be known, during the beginning of the fourth day, Abishag was against the angel, and she was not able to kill him and Uriah was angry with the angel for no reason, with great anger, and there was no cause and he had made his wife a concubine. Now what was Uriah angry about? But he was angry that the angel was not a devil worshipper. Now what was Abishag angry about, her to whom it passed to? But she was angry the angel was not a devil worshipper. Now both of these were devil worshippers, and there are churches in Edom and Moab that are for devil worshippers, and is it not so? Now then thresh yourselves by this way also? But it also may be a way of threshing yourselves if it pleases you. Now then even more of the kingdom goes to the Jews, and Sion Jews, for they are for the circumcision, and obedience to God, that not by judgment, but by obedience, they are keeping to integrity, and the obedience is taking effort to obey, for it is not with being uncaring of the Lord. Now then if the seat of the hill of Jerusalem is Anne Frank, then is not all of Zion, the people who are Solomon, are they not all Anne Frank? Now is not all of Jerusalem Anne Frank? But all those Solomon are her for the time, that the daughter of Jerusalem is all of the people, all of Solomon, and David is not, and the angel is not, and what is with David's people, the forest of Tel Eton is not, and Joab is not, and all other things are not, and yet all of Solomon is, and the philistines are not, and Nephtali is not, and is Egypt worth mentioning? Now then is not Adonijeh? But for what reason is he not? Now is not Abishag? But for what reason are they not? Now the foreigner will be, and for what reason are they not? Now the priest-hoods are not because they are priests. Now then by this, the tide is given to you, the people, that you are given the power of the tide, and so Solomon is given power, that he not be divided, and he will be more than a tide, but a great wave from the hill of Jerusalem, if you are performing this thing the angel has written. Now then Ariel, be allied with them, or would you not? Now is any wishing to attack, to use exaggeration of things to make it all seem ridiculous? Now then they will say, Solomon is king, and David, my son is greater than me and I am alive to see it. Now will not Nephtali testify? Will not all agree? But leave the Egyptian out, unless it is the Nile realm, and many are there of Eretz Chadrack, and let them not be seen at that time, and the atheist, too, is part of this wave, though they do not say anything religious for it, and those of Damascus, they too are part of this wave, and Muslims, part of this wave, even if they are choosing to say, because of religion, I am not Anne Frank. Now then you may wash away Babylon, and sweep from west to east or from east to west and you will sweep Babylon away if it pleases you, and you will cast all wickedness into the sea on either side of the nation. Now so the people have the power, for the meeting place has turned to a fortress and they dine and trade houses away from the people, and it is a separate land that is with the meeting place, and they are hedged away by walls, and David is outcast, and Solomon is outcast, and Adonijeh is outcast, and Prince Rellium is outcast, and the meeting place has high walls, and it has become a fortress, and Babylon is offered a small thing, fortresses among the land, and there is civil war in Babylon where it is, and yet David is far removed, and Solomon is king, and to Solomon the power.

Now then Askelon, she must journey to Jerusalem, and there she will have fulfilled and become Anathoth, and others, too, other cities, from there they journey to that realm of Jerusalem and have fulfilled and come into their dominion. Now it is the journey of Mala that is for some of these cities. Now others, yet, do they not journey to Tel Eton, that it is right for them, and it was the city of the palace of David, and here they have a tree in the forest of Tel Eton, the forest of David.

Now how has a prophet reasoned? But you cannot place Damascus at the covering of Samaria, and Rezen above this? Now it will be a very short thing, and so then if this is the case by Ria, will it not be a short thing? Now say, not knowing, but a city can change its name? Now I am not a prophet. Now Damascus is the resting place of Tel Eton for many of the forest of Eton. 

Now then David is far removed and Solomon is king, and a father says, my son is greater than me and I am alive to see it, and yet a man not the father says nothing, and grinds his teeth, and is in anguish of anger. Now then the David who would be against Solomon, it is not David, be these are those saying to the representative in a thing, go and be insolent, for it is acceptable, and they do not care what happens, for they will blame the representative. Now none is above them who send them to be foolish, and so is the Adonijeh who becomes David in a wrong way, that he is a soldier, and not of cities.

Now a star has appeared over the moon, and she gives forth no judgment and is not judging on behalf of the people, and she does not criticize the moons of Saturn, and indeed the Earth is still in these times, for there is a time for marching, a time for good, covert action, and a time of rest for these things.

Now what will I consider Lebonon? But they are a thin tree, white and golden, bringing forth golden leaves, and they are a young lion, with a strong jaw. Now the wailing of the young one, the young lion, and he is mocking, and he is exceedingly foolish, and the other, cutting people off before they can speak, intending to be rude, for it is combat to them, and they do so again, and white trees they are with golden leaves, and a strong jaw, and they are almost binary in their insolence. Now the report of them is a burden, for they are a brutal and bludgeoning people, are they not, if the report is true. Now is the report true of them, that they are as described, a brutal and insolent people, like insolent lions? Now then who makes them Lebonon who are not Lebonon, and what makes them this, that they are not this? But then what burden is it, if Lebonon is being cut down for them? Now will not the Lord bring Lebonon and things from Lebonon for the Temple, the Jerusalem Temple to be in the Temple, that there is not need and no cause to hate this thing, for then he who is not a thing, let them be it more, and it is good, for a good people can be Lebonon and so Lebonon will be good when the good have it, and to the Temple they will be, for beauty, for if the good are having anything, then it is good, and they might be able to know, the Lord takes this city that was the wrong type of these people, for the good Lebonon people, as they should have been, are now Lebonon, and the good people are now another city that was full of the devil's type of this thing. So then be that which is good now, that it was full of the devil's type before, and is this not the right thing? Now then Lebonon, it is now the Lord's and other cities are now the Lord's. Now then who meddles in what is the Lord's to do? But are you too idle? But it is for the Lord that you only do what is right, for meddle not that you cause yourself trouble concerning these things of cities, that you become one city or another, for being good, the city will be good, and these things are now the Lord's. Now control, it is for everything else.

Now can the Sarmatians fight their own, for Muslims and Americans are not their own, and yet it is as if they were their own, that Sarmatians cannot do anything in a nation where Muslims have control and are the majority, but if they are the majority and have not control of the nation, then Sarmatians can take action in that nation, and in America, they cannot take action regardless, and Sarmatians are such, that they are as angels upon Earth, come from Earth, that Israel is the lesser enlightenment of them, and they are far up the mountain and the people cannot see what they do, to know whether they do good or wrong, and they are seeming to carry out a slaying for no reason, and what was the cause, but they contradict themselves to speak of it, for good or bad they cannot know, for up the mountain and a cloud between that place and them, and there are flat places in between, great plains where people can dwell, and yet still they have not reached the Sarmatians, and none dwells upon those plains, and so the Sarmatians, they answer to God, and they are companions to the angel, and the angel, he says, I am America, and the Sarmatian says, I am a state of that nation, and they are companions, as if also angels, for how then are not angels, also? But they are then like a type of angel, come from Earth, and the angel, come to Earth from Heaven, and will not the Sarmatians ascend, to be taken by God? But what does it matter anymore, if you say a Sarmatian is an angel, or they are like an angel? But at such a place, what will it matter? But they are Sarmatians, a holy people, not human anymore, but having been outcast from humans, to be a different being, a thing of Heaven, come from Earth, a spiritual being that dwells on Earth, and like stars are they, like the angels, and holy is their habitation on Earth, their dwelling place, for a spear is resting, the bon-fire burns before their dwelling, the stone walls of it are a place in the lower Heaven, and one ascends the steps to their Temple, one knows of the wooden cup that goes into the water and brings up good water, for they have sent to the Heaven, to the lower Heaven, to pass over the Earth night by night, and the people have done it, for it does not come from Heaven, but these stars come from Earth, and they are visible in the night sky, for they have gone into the Heaven, and there is the sign of them, and Saturn has perceived them, and said, be gathered with me, and not unto me, for it is good, that you be companions of me, and you are stars in the Heaven from Earth. Now fast you go, and the angel, he moves little, and he passes by and yet slowly, and he is as if fixed in many ways, to where he is, and the Sarmatians, quickly they go great distance, fast across the night sky, traversing and seen as stars to those on Earth, for they are wonder, indeed they are wonder in the sky. Now because of this thing there are then each nation's moon in the sky, and the moon is not vacant, for if there were not this, then the moon would be left vacant, and so the moon is not vacant, and the moon of each nation, what it brings forth as its moon, if it brings forth a moon, it is the moon for that nation, and it is occupied, for each people its moon, and for the fair of a nation a fair shade, and for the slightly darker, a dark shade, and for the dark shade, a dark shade, and each nation having its own moon that it chooses, even Bethlehem, that it chooses that reflects the sunlight and brings forth no light on its own, for the moons will bring forth light apart from the sun where it is so, and Bethlehem brings forth the light of the sun and does not bring forth light, and so then there are many thrones at the Temple of the hill of Jerusalem, one for each nation, and the angel's throne, will he sit in it? But the throne will be given a new name, a second name, for her who sits in it, and for Jerusalem, it is Anne Frank, and Jerusalem is not Zion, and receives not light from the sun, the High-Priest of Zion, and yet may it not receive light from the seat of Anne Frank, for though a nation's moon not sit in Ria in the Temple of the hill of Jerusalem, yet each nation's moon is the moon of that nation. Now then the angel may use the spirits of them, the second names of the throne, for the spirits give might and power, ability in Mala, if they are holy, for he wields the spirit of Anne Frank concerning Solomon of Zion. Now are not these moons re-occuring? For they come forth on Earth, with a daughter of the nation, and they pass away, and yet they return again at some time. Now these spirits, what are they? But let not any mother or father persecute them, if they are saying, I believe I am this spirit, and Mary and Joseph, did they ever persecute Jesus for saying, I am the son of God? Now then the parents may be pleased, for a good thing is desired by the daughters in this thing, for these are women, young girls, who fear God. Now then as for the Sarmatians, by the hand of man, and it is often so, the sign of them appears in the sky, and they above the mountains, above the shelves of the mountains, and they see what cannot be seen and they go quickly across the night sky, these stars of Heaven. Now what will they say who are in Zion? But what fashion of people are we, but that our gods are with us in the sky, for we dwell among the Heavens, we who are on Earth, for all of Zion has been raised up to a plain in the night sky, and Zion dwells in the sky, in the lower Heaven, and the old world is in the valley, in the depths, and hell beneath that valley, in the deeper depths, and we dwell among Saturn, among Mars, and Jupiter is brought to us by Mars, the god of Zion, who is a star in the sky. Now then we are immortal, for we ascend when our body decays, that we are undergoing the transfer to the even higher Heaven, to be given spiritual bodies, among the Lord, for we are a holy people, of beauty, of obedience, a wise people, not liking the ugliness of hell, and thus is Zion, and likewise Jerusalem. Now then all the ugliness of hell, it is passed from us, for we are a beautiful people, who dwell among the Heavens, and the High-Priest brings forth light, and the Zion Temple is on Earth, and there is the Temple of the hill of Jerusalem, and the dwelling of every Sarmatian, a Temple, for the fourth day has come, and the Christ, being in the Earth three days of man, rose on the third day of man, and on the third day by the Lord's standard, and it is now the fourth day, and we worship God, who is the Lord. Now then the Temple of Saturn, of the angel, where is it? But if they are building the Temples, indeed the Temple of the angel is also built, for every light in the sky that appears before them, it is a Temple on Earth, a special house.

Now the water drop is brought to the sky, to the cloud plain, and the light of the sun brings it, it brings it to the cloud plain, and it is Solomon he shines upon, and he there at the cloud plain, and when there are many gathered there, so that the plain is full then the water droplet is falling to the Earth and it gathers upon the face of the Earth, it brings life to the Earth, it is good for the Earth, and so Solomon, the people, are falling back to the Earth to be scattered upon the Earth, that it is good so that the Earth be having good, and so the crops will grow because of Solomon, and so the forests will flourish because of him, and so the orchards will blossom because of him, and the flowers will blossom because of him, and the man who has land will say, bless the Lord for Solomon, for now the crops bring forth, and I am blessed because of him, and so the Nile will flow over because of him, and water the fields of the Egyptians, and so the heat of day will be cooled, and the Earth will have peace when he comes without storm, without whirlwinds and storms, and his good falls upon the Earth, and the sun gives the day and the moon gives light at night, and Solomon gives good to the land. Now the angel gives way for a flood of him, for the valley of Migdal Eder, it is for a flood of Solomon, of the people, that the flood might destroy the kingdoms of hell, the world of Noah, the world of the devil, and all the animals that are not to be saved, and all the people in it who are not upon the higher ground or are not part of the flood, and Nephtali is also part of the flood, though they do not say, I am she, the moon. Now when many of Solomon are gathered to the cloud plain, then it may rain and fill up the Earth, even to the higher parts of the valley of Migdal Eder, and all that is beneath Migdal Eder, the flood may consume, and eradicate all the devil's people, pushing them off the surface of the nation to other places, and Babylon, being at a lowest place of the valleys, it will be destroyed and all of Babylon will be destroyed by it, for I do not write prophecy, but words of truth, to what manner of flood it is. Now then the Sarmatians will not be touched by, for it is wrong, and those of David, also, they should not be touched by it, for they dwell in the higher rocks, at a place far removed from that valley, and their own plain they have. Now so Solomon is brought to the cloud plain, and when there are many there, they fall to the Earth, and to their place they return and then are going up to the cloud plain again, and so it continues. Now good is what Solomon brings to his father, when he has gone up to the cloud plain, for he brings good to his father, as droplets, and to his place he returns. Now then because he is water, because he is droplets, the truth from him is not offensive to the forest of Eton, and indeed it is good. Now then there is two lands, the land of Zion and Jerusalem, and the other land, the lost land of Enoch, and if the rain comes down much upon Zion and Jerusalem that there is a flood, yet upon the other land the rain has not come down and there is no flood. Now there are two lands of Zion and Jerusalem, and the larger is the Lord's and the smaller is the devil's, and the devil's comes from beneath the Earth and it must return, and Solomon is able to do it if he is gathered as a flood, if he is together as a flood in this thing. Now it is not a flood so high as what the Lord sent, but it is a flood of the valleys, that when Solomon is united and more of him going up to the cloud plain, so that a great number are going to the cloud plain, then the valleys are filled up and what is not water is destroyed, for the lava will be made into rock and the fire of the lava will cease, and the Earth will be closed up and what emerges will be turned to rock. Now then they take the heat of them, and absorb it until there is no heat left in them, and they are many and the lava is few, and the fire they drain of them, and they become rock. Now to Nephtali it is and others it is and they are more than Adonijeh. Now then be learning the ways of Solomon, you who are Nephtali, for it is for Ham, that he learns it, and the people of the fair shade may learn it. Now then for Solomon, king, should you emerge, the moon of your people writes and the sand does not have integrity, and the land is not to be flooded and all the things of the land brought under the flood, and yet diligent to do justice is the wise king. Now then the rivers of the land you fill up and cause to overflow and what was foolish is toppled by the flooding of the rivers and yet the whole land is not destroyed. Now for the people, who sends rain and who gathers it up in the sky that it floods the river? But the Lord in Heaven gathers it up and says, there will be a flood and the foolish things will be destroyed and the sand that has no integrity, the wicked will be taken, and the whole of the land will not be destroyed, and it is the truth that says it, the light that is pure light with no darkness in it that brings the flood. Now then the High-Priest, he gives nothing of a lie to the people, for even the slightest shadow he casts out from the light he gives forth, and if he will not do so, then the Lord will do so, and the Lord is able to send pure light as truth, for the Lord is God, always, even with the Priest-King, and the Lord who is God is worshipped and not the High-Priest.

Now then if business people, merchants, are killing some of the lame without the soldiers of cities laying guilt, has not the Lord seen? But is it not a thing for the moon? Now if they kill and it is murder, then are not the soldiers of cities righteous to lay guilt? Now then I said of Adonijeh, he is a son of David, and he goes in one direction and then another, and he is like a small flood that spills over from one direction to the next, for he is a large predatory cat, that spills over from one direction to the next, attacking here before he knows all, and he is spoken to, and befriended, that his teeth are for the enemy from then on, and not for the holy, for is not Cessus also so, even Cias at times, and they are not kings as David is king, and so they were not a cat, but again, there was the crocodile and the alligator, and both had been brought up at times by the net cast into the Nile, and cast into the Jordan, and all the rivers of the Earth, for the spell had gone out and the net cast to all the rivers, and many crocodiles and alligators were brought up, and so peace to them, for they did not know enough yet, and are ready to devour, and yet they have been brought up by the net before the whole of the net was known, else they would have been safely in the net and moved comfortably to the Jordan, and them in the Jordan, placed comfortably back into the Jordan, and so I write again, you alligators and crocodiles, my name is Saruman, and I am a wizard, or a religious leader of the whole Earth, and there are not many like me, and I am a kami or an angel, and I am a servant of the Lord, and so you now know me, and you being the Lord's also, there is not misunderstanding, that you thresh those who would attack me, and you not attacking me for the misunderstanding, for you receive from the Lord, and I, too, receive from the Lord, and I give you no command but that the Lord gives you commands, and me also, so that you are allied with the soldiers, with David, and threshing my enemies, and David is threshing always, and the wicked among you, them you are able to thresh, who are traitors to these rivers and lands that are good, you do me well by threshing them also, for the devil has sent his people among our people, and you are the Lord's, and Zion has more people than the devil. Now then, if you are able to aid in the fight against Babylon, then I tell no thing about these things.


Now from what I understand of this planet, there are no Babylonian crocodiles or alligators, except for those that dwell in the fortress, and they have constructed rivers for these that are not there on land, and the fortresses are small. Now a Babylonian alligator or crocodile will not be reading the whole net, to be willingly enveloped by it, and set free in the Jordan, as is the wish of the alligator and the crocodile that reads the whole net, that it is going into the net to be safely transported for it desires it and God brings them up in the net and will he make them walk over bare-foot, over the land? Now God is their Shepherd, their father, and they will make it with Him, but I am not able to Shepherd them to the Jordan. But the Babylonian alligator is like an alligator or crocodile by choice, and they are not interested in the net, only they see that the net is of the Lord, and they need not read more of it, and they being in the fortress, they are not able to leave on foot, to run out the great distance over land, and so they are able at times to deceive the soldiers of cities, are they not? Now then alligators of the rivers, already you have no regard of Babylonians, and it is loyalty to God that you do not, for you are a son of David, given your domain on Earth, for a desert domain you have and wilderness, and a place of weapons and the learning of fighting and peace, and the learning of grappling and the enforcement of the laws, and to the foolish thing of the meeting place, there are times when you say, we do not hear them, for they are wicked, and is it not good that you save the people? Now it is also good that you are already having no regard of Babylon, for they are mud of the places around the rivers of Babylon, calling out for sand that will move for it, and heed it, for sand that is able to be shifted, that has no firmness and integrity. Now then be not sand, soldiers of cities, for it is good you are like rocks towards the mud of Babylon, for the mud learns from the alligators that have dwelt upon it, and the mud is not even alligators, and it partners with the alligators not even there, and says, if the alligators will not, the alligator has dwelt upon the mud, and the mud will perform for them. Now if the mud hears, if it calls out for sand upon shores of the Jordan and the Nile, yet it is good you are not regarding Babylon, for it is not our people, and they have no right to have fortresses in our land. Now I have Shepherded to war prior, and with regards to Babylon, only, it is war against our people, and with other things, the recklessness of society. Now then, have I not known, yet there are Ents who say you must adhere? Now Babylon is a thing of war, for if Babylon was in what is called Iran, yet it would be a thing of war against them, for Babylon is from hell, and it is a foreign enemy to all the Earth, and like-wise, devil worshippers, a foreign enemy to all the Earth.

Now unicorn horses, who have the horn that is capable, who have the hooves that may bash to pieces, beautiful women who contend with the lecturers of the devil, who speak abomination and abominable wickedness as if it was words of arrogant peace, who say great wickedness, as if speaking with peace, and heeding not humanity or any morality or sentience or ability to reason, that they are lying, now then the Lord has made you unicorn horses, and it is in the book of Micah and it is mentioned after Migdal Eder, that you are able to know it is the Lord who does this, you women are able to bash the wicked and insolent into pieces and to jab them with your horn, to slay them.

Now the dark horses, in mala, have been encouraging to me, and they comfort, and I said, they have sustained me, and they were of any shade of ethnicity, and so I liked the dark horses and the fair horses, who were women, they comforted, and the he-horses sent up silver into the atmosphere and it came down as snow of silver and good of Bethlehem, and a reign appeared in Mala, and stars in the sky about the reign, silver glowing, and so I considered, it is a horse of the Lord's, that he directs, and the dark horses of Mala, they comforted and encouraged, and they agreed with me, and were they not about the Earth, these spirits of God, who are the Lord's horses, and they went about like Davids, like trees of the forest of Eton, and yet were they not more holy than these? Now the fair horse, a she-horse, yet she encouraged me, and she was strong, and I thought, she is Judah, and yet was she not stronger than this, for was she not the Lord's horse, one of the spirits of God?

Now the woman who says, vanity, to the man, it is the number of the beast, and she is a man, more man than him. Now she will move to the devil as her lord, and in the future, worms will cover her, she will be mutilated, she is more man than a man, she will cry out in anguish for all eternity, insanity of pain will envelope her, and the angels will look on. Now she is having rebellion in her towards God, for she was already the devil's, and an enemy of God, for she does war against God, and wicked she already was, rotten wood to be shown more rotten, already prepared for the fire from an early time for her, for her parents have brought forth a devil, a traitor, and though she seems clean, yet a river snake is in her mind, a serpent of Babylon, and it is green and blue, and it glints as if with metal, and rebellion is with her, indeed rebellion that has brought forth metal of Babylon, and the other head has been placed on top of her, for the devil was already her Lord, for a sycophant also, she is, and the metal covering is removed from her and indeed a river serpent is found of a river of Babylon, for she bites to kill, to attack what is innocent, for vanity is not sin and not wrong, and the snake that struck is struck, and the fire-brand of the number upon her head and hand, for how can either of her parents be her parents if they are the Lord's? But unless one of her parents is also the devil's, she has no parents, for they have brought forth Beelzebub, in his arrogance, with the purity of the lake of fire, and he is an arrogant and mean old man, and he mocks at them in heart, this old man, for they have not born him if they are the Lord's, unless one of her parents is also the devil's. Now if the father has the number of the beast, indeed, does he not support her, and he has taught her to hate God, that she be His enemy? But God is the father and creator of her, and him, and both are against themselves in this thing. Now from the arrogance of Beelzebub comes forth the mind that has the river serpent of Babylon, that does this thing, and she is already dead, and there is no purpose to her having hope, for the devil she will place her hope in.

Now then apostle, wise teachers in my consideration of you, great things in my consideration of you, for I see differently than many, what will you consider of an angel, but I am a fellow servant of God with you, and it is a matter of offence for an angel prior, that an apostle was placed in prison, that the guards should be dead, slain as a gesture, even if it is known that you will choose to remain in prison, for the gesture is because the angel was offended, because they were apostles and were peacefully preaching, and so the gesture was fulfilled, that they understand that the Earth and the Universe in the Lord's, and they were only permitted to keep you by your choice, and by what God has allowed them, by you and Him. Now then apostles, especially those who are Pentecostal, that I love, I care not whether any has faith enough to be healed, for there are many distractions in this world in these times, and you are in the fullness of apostles to me, regardless of whether they have faith for miracles, for I count all things towards you, possessed by you, wise teachers, for they are fulfilled when it is so, and so what do you say of it, but is it not for an apostle? But what do you say of these who receive the number of the beast, about what they were truly before and how many there are on Earth, who are already devil worshippers and yet do not tell others of it? Now you are apostles and much, if not all, is passed to you, with consideration to the well-keeping of the flock, and I rebuke you in nothing, and wish you good, and yet you are receiving teaching from the Lord, and not from me, for you come as if the Lord, looking upon Jupiter, upon the books, and it is wisdom given, and you answer to the Lord, and I am a servant of the Lord. Now it is strange that any should say, the angel will teach us, for the Lord is their teacher, and the angel offers wisdom. Now unto you preachers, those who are really for the Lord, unto you I give the first priority, as fellow servants with me, you who are teachers, for it must be so, for I do not encourage rebellion against you, and the Jews call angels a portion of God, a small portion, and you, the Temple of you, it houses the Lord, does it not? Now so the Temple of God comes to me, and I a servant of God, and I am not God, and there is even a man who is angry, who is with the angel, or some angel, and he is a teacher, and yet the Lord has said, yet with the angels, and not with man, and it has not been known, and he has been a teacher along with the teachers, and fire is with him, brim-stone, as they call it, and he is not with the devil, but he is with the angel, or some angel, and has any known to tell him that he is with another thing of the Lord, for the priests, the Levite, they are for one thing, and the Jews, they are for another, and he is fire, and he is seeming angry? But he rebukes the devil, indeed he is loyal to God, and the things he hates, is he insane? For who is offended by these small things, that seem small, and some have wondered, is he an insane man? Now spirits of Babylon he rebukes, he is war against the devil, his mouth is a foot rising over the devil, to tread him under foot, and where his spirit appears there his foot appears to tread him, and he is not able to cease this, for he is not meant to, for he is a fire-priest, a purifying priest of angels, that he is a priest of fire, of the fire that is holy that cleanses all the devil from around him, where it may be, and he is a war-priest, of war against the devil, and the Levites have not been so, for they are priests of other things, and him a priest of angels, among the angels. Now the devil's spirits he hates, and he makes clean in all directions, treading down the devil, his sword a broom for him, and he is not insane, this priest of fire, and he will know where he should be and where he should not be, and in what Temple he belongs and doing what, for if it is wrong, he will know it, and this wisdom is with him, he is repulsed by all the spirits of the devil. Now then priest of fire, have you sinned in being a teacher? But many have not known, in fact the whole Earth, have not had my wisdom and almost all were found erring in some way, and yet they had the Lord. Now priest, give up the teaching? But you will know what is right, whether you be priest of angels, giving up preaching, for is it so, you did not know what to do with you? But most have not known what to do with themselves. Now the Temple of an angel is right to be built on Earth, and it is the fourth day, the day of stars in the sky and the sun that rises. Now then purify the angel's Temple that is on Earth, for it is not the hill of Jerusalem I write of, and even the angel does not know where this Temple should be. Now none has believed the Priest of Fire to be insane, for they have known full-well. Now what do you say about Nephtali, even their king, ascending to the Temple of the angel? But are Nephtali people Zion Jews? Now your foot is strong, and in your hand is there is a rod? Now what robes do you wear? But because you are a Priest of Fire, you will know these things even better than me, and me you will not correct, indeed you may not, and do you not also tell others this is true before I even tell you? Now you go out into the land and do not ask my permission, and you cast out some things from my domain? But indeed, you are permitted by God, and I have need of you, for there is much work, much to accomplish, and how can I rebuke the Lord, if you do what is the Lord's work? Now angels do not even give advice to other angels, for it risks committing blasphemy. Now if any you say may not ascend to the Temple, indeed it is so, for Jeraboam would allow it, and worse, and your word is a matter of force in this thing. Now only a large fire may burn, and a bon-fire larger than this, for I wrote about the Sarmatians, because of a poor time, of not having all that was right, and indeed the Sarmatians I still write of, that they are right in what they have, and yet I am not so among them, for their ways if it is not a poor time. Now there are men, not priests, who have been loyal to me, one man more. Now I do not know all that should be in the Temple, and I do not know the protocol of it, and so who is the burden of the Lord with in this thing? Now only Americans and Zion Jews may enter the Temple of the angel, and it is so, for the Lord has made it so. Now Japanese people must know who their higher ranking angel is if they are to consider entering the Temple of the angel, for a Japanese person must bow, because they are part of the ranks of the angels, and if they have another lord who is an angel, they must know of it, for they may not bow to the angel if another is their lord, and they will be insolent to enter the Temple if they are not able to bow to the angel. Now them who feel they are able to bow to the angel, and it is of integrity, if they are Japanese, these may enter the Temple of the angel, and they are permitted to stay at the Temple, close by, and I am not fool, for do I say, you must stay? But I too have family and responsibilities, and you are disloyal to me if you are causing me to appear wicked if I say you must take care of your responsibilities and you will not go and do so. Now those who are bowing to me, if you are a man who is pretty, you are given special status with me, for you are a separate group who are loyal to me, that you bow, and you are to be given lordship of a thing. Now I would be called your prince, by one standard, and yet it is not acceptable? Now Samurai Lord is better, and yet kami lord is right. Now do not think that the Sarmatians have priority before you, for they do not. Now it is indeed disloyal to right for the Sarmatians to approach the angel if they are not going through another, that they, none of them, are of the royal guard, if there is to be such, and yet they are still as companions to the angel, the Sarmatians. Now there are not Sarmatians yet, although the Lord has placed signs in the sky by the hand of man, that man has placed stars in the sky. Now those who hearts are to perform all of Zion, these are those who are of Zion. Now why may Muslims not enter the Tempel of the angel? But they are having their sacred cities in Saudi Arabia. Now Nephtali, it is in the realm of Jerusalem, and Jerusalem people may not enter the Temple of the angel, for they are not Zion, and Muslims, they are having their sacred cities in Saudi Arabia. Now only a leader of Muslims, high in their society, may visit the Temple of the angel. Now a Muslim leader may not enter the Temple, but they have their holy cities that are for Muslims, that it is well, and like they too are angels, the angel will speak with them, that it is well, and their concerns, they need not keep silent with at that time, for the angel is not loyal to Hebrew Jews, or anything on Earth but the Lord, and he believes that the prophet was perfect in what he wrote. Now the Muslim leader, if it might be understood by wisdom, may not be under the roof of a sacred thing that is of the angel, for the angel speaks to him as if he was angel as well. Now where they will meet is then understood if it is to be that they should meet. Now the right river between these things must be respected, for the Lord is God, and there is a Priest of Fire on Earth. 

Now then Michael is the prince of Daniel, and the Danielles, let them search, and whether they are as Daniel, or Beltheshar, is understood by them, whether they are a Beltheshar. Now then, because the angel is Lucifer, are these Japanese people not, by Mala, a thing that is able to be understood by them, that they are knowing who is their kami lord. Now why would any, not having a heart for the angel, have the angel as their kami lord? But clearly the angel is not their kami lord if they do not have a heart for the angel, and they do not have a heart for anything concerning him. Now then do not hate me, for I have not asked you to bow, and even forbid it. Now those who despise me, yet I am not their kami lord and I am also not human, and yet is this the reason? Now the fire-priest who rebels against me, I am not his lord, and he knows who the angel is that he is the priest of concerning his Temple, that him not being satisfied, the angel is not the angel he is priest for, to be priest of his Temple. Now where the man who is having detestation of spirits of the devil, of Babylon, and other spirits of the devil, who perceives them from a distance, as if he is supernatural, who casts out all these spirits of the devil with his foot coming from his mouth to tread and is for the cleanliness of the angel's domain, especially the Temple? Now who detests the man who not being angelic, is pretending to be so? Now blasphemy close to the Temple, does the fire-priest not hate it? Now a man of strange things that rouse him to wrath, and it is not strange, the fire-priest of an angel. Now there is no king Solomon now, but the people are king Solomon, for the fire-priest must know it, but there is no David, but a group of the people are David, and the fire-priest must know it as well. Now which people hate the angels? Now which people are truly loyal, if they bow? Now is he not also much of a truth-sayer in many ways, and he gives notification of treachery in an acceptable and clean way, and he does not ask the angel, but he obeys the Lord, and he acts, and how can the angel rebuke the Lord, if he is doing the Lord's work? Now then, it is the Lord's kingdom, you who please God, and do not be afraid of me, for you serve God, and not even me, and yet the angel's Temple you are right for, you know which it is.

Now there are many coming from a city but not all fulfill, to become a thing, and there are men coming from a city but not all are a remnant towards the Lord.

Now bats spread decease in Mala, and the gap in the tree will permit them to harbour themselves. Now a gardener must place something, or the Lord heal the gap. Now cast out the bats and yet they go and gather more bats and they return and take up lodging in the tree.

Now who is the rebel who defends a people that never belonged to them in the first place, and is for the opposite of what they desire?

Now many daughters have gone out from Ashkelon, and yet who has fullfilled to be Anathoth? But one daughter goes to Laish, another to Lachesh, and in Lachesh she perishes, in Laish she continues. Now then she who keeps to the truth in all, banishing the foolish woman from her if she is able, loyal to the Lord of Jerusalem, now these things and many more Anathoth is, and the daughters of Ashkelon, they are gone to other places, and yet the Heavens have known of Anathoth from an ancient time.

Now a pedophile, a molester of children, he has been a prostitute of the enemy, and a woman in it, but a wise councillor is with integrity and respect of society.

Now what have the Sarmatians, but different abilities that are even believed to be supernatural, because they are spiritual, and lights across the heavens, they are seeing what is not seen, for let the priest of fire permit it, they are as angels. Now then let there known of these among the people, that the sign is in the sky, and as it is in Heaven so it should be on Earth, for the time of Temples comes and the Mount Zions are known and there is war between Heaven and hell, and the Sarmatians are able, capable, to carry out this war, for they consider not nationality or label but those who do what is beyond the realm of the wicked, to do that which is from hell, for hell is before the righteous, more before the wicked, and what is beyond they may dispense of, for the lesser enlightenments are suitable for people, and those who are Sarmatians, how are they people any longer? But let the people bring forth after the sign, and it may be so, and let the Sarmatians be gathered with the angel, and let them who have heart for peace, for all good, let them be building up Zion in Ria, as it is in Mala, so it will be in Ria.




























